Scoop tuna mixture with ice cream scooper for equal portions and flatten on panko crumbs. Turn to coat other side.
OK, back to the not so great side of customer service.
The past few years, hubby and I have been enjoying ripe local peaches every summer. We buy quarts of peaches at the Farmers' Market every week from AgriBerry, Schepp's produce stand, Thistledown Farms, or pre-order Henley's Orchard peaches from the Victory Farms. At home and at the restaurant, we're so peachy for a few weeks. We eat them fresh, slice and toss them into salad with pecans and goat cheese, make jams, bake them into an upside down cake, blend in smoothies, slice and smother it in Greek yogurt and drizzle with Alfredo Honey, or on a lazy morning I'd make crepes and stuff them with fresh peaches. Life is peachy good...
Peggy Noonan is one of those people the Left loves to display.
Now that you have all the money in the world, what gives you the ambition to actually keep on going with it instead of just sitting back and relaxing?
I went back to the condo to eat. Then I went to the Barangay Hall.
Even prior to announcement of the DSG, the American military is still pursuing WMD’s as combat troops have been deployed to chase local ‘terrorists’ that pose no threat to the US; such as the Lord’s Army in Uganda and escalating a US military presence dispatching 2,500 Marines to Australia to protect US ‘national interests’ in the South China Sea and Indian Ocean.
The nursery is WELL on it's way....I will do a post about it soon....might do one sooner and then another one once it's all done!! It's looking like a princess room for SURE!! LOVE IT!!!
You’re a bitch and not always kind, but I love you and nothing more.
this week i recieved the first and last compliment from my sister in the form of a text declarind 'you are rachel knoo (from the little paris kitchen)'. naturally i have worn lipstick everyday since.
In a few years, however, the area’s ruin would be testament to a bargain we had tried to strike. The pictures record what we purchased, what we paid, and what we could not buy. They document a separation from ourselves, and in turn from the natural world that we professed to love. —R.A., 1995
“Roving Apps” – This space will be dedicated to reviewing new apps, old apps, useful ones, and ones that might be better served remaining in the App Store. My reviews will be based on classroom use and my own exploration of what is out there and what I have found as more and more apps for the iPad are created.
The ColourQ combo this week was another tough one for me, but I knew that the graphic style of this week's Retro Sketch would work well with them. I had planned on using one of the text image stamps from PTI's Text Styles border set to create the strip across the card front, but when I saw the new A Blog Named Hero challenge to use sentiment stamps in a way different from what they were meant to be used as I decided to use a couple of sentiments from the HA set Year Round Sentiments. The flowers are from another HA set Bold Pop Designs. Despite the fact that the flowers do cover up some of the sentiments, you can still figure out that it says "I miss you" and "Thinking of you". I was quite impressed that I managed to get everything to line up so well just by eyeballing it! I stamped a flower in the following colors, Ruby Red, Pool Party & So Saffron and then cut them out using the matching die. Clear rhinestones were added to the centers. The sentiments were stamped using Early Espresso. I rounded the opposite corners of the card front to add an additional bit of interest.
6. Any Colour You Like
I'm pretty sure if Tenia had seen my dorm room, back in the day, she wouldn't have asked me to participate. I wish a I had a picture to share (I'm sure you could use the laugh). It consisted of a hunter green and white striped comforter (K-Mart), matching pillows/towels/etc. in burgandy, and the focal point was a poster of Miss Piggy (yeah, I have no idea).
I also remember reading a quote somewhere by a French military officer (I think) that went something like “War ruins a perfectly good Army.”
-include "The Fest" in the subject line of your message or it will not be considered;
This was updated to a general grind build. You can change your "main" element around, but it's recommended you get 3 of each element so not only can you face malice with little fear, but if enemies that resist your main element pop up, you can use another element to help you out. You also could just go dual elements instead, ideally fire and ice.
Double lined dress with quality chiffon as inner lining
The auto industry companies that refused his “investment” or “rescue” did quite well without it. The Obama administration is likely to have a multi-billion loss when it sells its remaining shares in General Motors, but of course that is taxpayer’s money. For the past two years GM has been forced to divert its assets to produce expensive electric cars no body wants.
As it is, I feel more like I've been taken captive to the Twilight zone of boring, where I do the same thing everyday, and can't leave. It's scary, and very dull.
Total word count: 550
Where to find Conquest of the Pole:
Jesus suffered verbal insults and physical abuse.
( I am curious to see what are the feelings that are passing through me. How can I straighten this situation for myself. )
Rascals.
We went onto have babies seven, eight and nine. By this point I was obviously no longer a child, and I was actually afraid to have ten kids. There was just something about hitting the double digit mark of kids that made me feel freakish. Maybe it was that teacher's voice echoing in my head, or maybe it was years worth of looks and comments. Either way, the very thought of ten kids scared me.
The second part of this blog hop is to sign up as a follower of the CMIT Blog, we will be hosting challenges, contests, tutorials and a new program called ATC Tuesday so you will not want to miss what we are up to next. Stay tuned for more creative news flashes.
To which BigD has to add his 2 cents, " YEAH, cuz licking people is gross!"
prizes (1 lucky winner will score the ENTIRE collection!) you can enter to win...but here's the thing...we're not telling you which blogs the prizes are on! ;)
The Pennsylvania Liquor Code (hereafter referred to as "the Code") is a plaything of various interests in the Pennsylvania legislature. The most recent example of this kind of thinking is the whole Sheetz/Wegmans uproar, in which politicians who are aligned with either the beer distributors or the New Drys say they are contemplating changes to the Code to keep beer out of grocery stores. Now you'll note that nothing has actually happened yet...and you'll also note that the "six-pack bill" is still diddle-fiddling around in committee.
Light gate, open house
According to a June 2010 Reuters report, Fosun, one of China’s largest private conglomerates, acquired 7.1% equity in Club Med, a French listed company and internationally famous leisure and resort group – the first such deal between the two countries’ businesses.
So, the comment today? It was something along the lines of "Do you think you and your husband caused your son's problems with your attitudes, or was he simply made that way?"
MESA DUQUE SS, PEREZ MORENO A, HURTADO G, ARBELAEZ MONTOYA MP. Effectiveness of an influenza vaccine in a working population in Colombia. Rev Panam Salud Publica 2001; 10: 232-239.
Don't forget that ideas predate policies and that their power, for good or ill, should never be underestimated. It was after all, that great incendiary journalist and armchair revolutionary, Karl Marx, who produced some of the most powerful ideas in history. Despite their murderous consequences some of these ideas still have an iron grip in South Africa.
And Daniel? He was the perfect prodigal son--flawed and torn but ready for redemption. During his heroic moments, he saves Grace without becoming untouchable. The relationship between Grace and Daniel was a refreshing change from the swooning heroine and her pedestal-bound savior. Grace has enough spunk and fire to stand up for herself and her beliefs, even as she tries to understand what those are. Jude was another brilliantly-developed character, another goody-goody who managed to still be likeable because of his sincerity, even as he makes his own life-changing decisions. The rest of the supporting cast was also really well developed, each character having their own traits and quirks but never overpowering the story, only contributing to it in small ways.
and a garment of praise
Pistono underplays, sensibly, how he's able to get in and out of Tibet and smuggle out hard evidence (hard to come by--see my review of Jonathan Green's "Murder in the High Himalaya") to show Congress and human rights organizations (who appear as many entities not to be able to overcome a growing Chinese manner of brushing such reports with disdain or indifference or platitudes). While this ability left me wondering, the slight elision in parts of his narrative is understandable. He adds notes for his sources and a glossary of terms and a bibliography point one to research and provide welcome help for lots of unfamiliar Tibetan names. Throughout this accessible, straightforward tale, his courage in getting out information in the soles of his shoes, straps of his backpack, or false bottom of his satchel remains admirable. You learn how difficult it is to sneak photos and reports used by the communist regime out of Tibet, and how necessary such an endeavor is if the West (or a few caring people among so many disinterested), is led to care and act.
Was it Montressor that showed me that nightmares
sigh.......of contentment and peace.
Rimmel Sexy Curves Full Volume & Curve Mascara. Love it. The wand is small enough to reach the inner eye lashes as well as the tiny outer ones. Now, I want to try Fairy Drops mascara.
II Corinthians 5:21
You’d have thought that canvas swag was welded to his ass
In darkness.
I was curious and started looking into the information surrounding the Brownsville revival. Like the Toronto blessing, the Brownsville revival had similar manifestations of the holy spirit, and following that was the Lakeland revival.
bathe in her essence
Carroll’s one-time close friend and college mate, Greg Robinson, was a disaster at Syracuse.
2.Floyd County Rambler - Step Stone
Yesterday's post was all about stats and the realization that my exercise habits have been sub-par over the last 29 weeks. I would like to get back to where I was in the 31 weeks before those sub-par weeks, and that is what this challenge is all about.
Ready for the beautiful warm weather! Have a great summer!
I cut a 4 3/4" x 3 1/4" piece of sage card stock. I attached this to the front of the card. I also punched a 3 1/2" oval from the sage green card stock.
But time was running out as officers had until last (Thursday) night to bring charges against four of them.
“Oh……yes.”
Like I said before this is everything I ever wanted from a black and tan. A lightness that you can only get from an ale, but a dark robust creamyness that you can only find in a porter or stout. This beer blends the best of both sides. It is an earthy beer, while still being refreshing, and all while having a huge body. This is a beer that has won over a place in my heart as well as in my fridge. You may not be the zazziest beer or be the most expensive or rare or aged. You are just good... enough said.
For example, if my 4 inch long piece only stretches to 5 inches long, (ie one inch is gained) then I have a 25% (1/4) stretch. If you are comparing two pieces of fabric, you don't have to do the math though. Just stretch them together and make sure they are pretty close. They don't have to be exact, but if you try to stitch something with a ton of stretch to something fairly stable, the stretchy side may grow out of proportion to the non-stretchy side.
After our hike we stopped for lunch and then hit the road. We had just gotten into the Phoenix city limits when Athletica realized she didn’t have her purse. I pulled into a gas station parking lot and we searched for it. No, it wasn’t there. I called the restaurant in Sedona and sure enough they had it. I put some more gas into the car and turned north back onto the I-17. We headed back to Sedona. The staff recognized us from a few hours earlier. We decided to stay for some warm sopapillas and honey before heading home. We ended up missing the Superbowl and all the illustrious commercials but all in all, I would not have changed a single thing about this past weekend. When we left Sedona, the almost full moon illuminated the giant rocks below. There is no show that can compare. The adventure continues.
But to me there is something very emotionally different about sacrificing yourself and sacrificing someone you love.
Hope this article I have linked to helps someone, it made me feel a bit stronger after reading thru it a few times.
I left the office just saying Thank You a million times in my head and out loud, I repeated and smiled and felt so much gratitude, it was just amazing. It set the tone for me to have an amazing day, and that’s exactly what I did! I had an amazing day!!!
When we say that by the year 2012 AD, those humans, both individually and collectively, will have reached a point of transformation, we speak about a point that we do not want you to forget. It will be a time of choices that each person, each nation, each race, and all sorts of groups and organizations of people, must make. Many will stand at the door of Initiation. Each will have to decide whether to hesitate, to walk through the door, or not to walk through the door that leads one into a higher, more refined level of consciousness. This will be one of the most important decisions concerning the use of one’s free will that one will encounter in their life. This is true because the decision each one will make can and will greatly influence the future, indeed the very “destiny” of the planet. It, in fact, will influence the destiny of humanity and all forms of life that dwell on Earth. And so to understand as thoroughly as possible by the human intellect about initiation is so very significant now.
D’HEILLY SJ, NICHOL KL . Work-site-based influenza vaccination in healthcare and non-healthcare settings. Infect Control Hosp Epidemiol 2004; 25: 941-945.
This simplistic, one-size-fits-all approach to vaccination is dangerous. Because there are children, who are at higher risk for becoming brain injured or dying after getting pertussis containing vaccines (DTaP, Tdap), including those who have suffered previous vaccine reactions like:21,22
"Hot diggity dog" MUST be followed by the words"it's a junkyard."
THE FED HAD TO PAY UP ON SEPTEMBER 12, 2001
“Dear Dad,” she said. “I found you, but I don’t think this is where my life is.” Although she didn’t want to stay with him, a stranger, she couldn’t wait to give him the letters that remained in her notebook.
Ostensibly, the purpose of their visit was to go over some issues they had with their essays. But deep down, they just wanted to be near her, and maybe engage in some enlightening and entertaining conversation. They harboured an admiration for her that they tacitly acknowledged in one another, but that their college sophistication would not permit to expose to the world. Their feelings for Gisela and determined struggle for women’s rights resembled those of a seventh-grade girl crush than that of serious progressive activists.
I then wrote a short story inspired by the travels. I can’t even remember what mine was about. But it took me five separate visits to the virtual drop box before I found the courage to post in my own text files. That was the first time I’d written something in twenty-five years.
TOPPING:
Overall, the demo impressed me. I didn’t have much thoughts on the game coming in and I can honestly say that the game exceeded my expectations. I really enjoyed the setting Yager established and the hints at a deep story also have me intrigued. The shooter mechanics are solid if not a little ‘par for the course’. I did notice a couple odd animations like a rope swinging unnaturally wild as I was rappelling down it. Still, this could be an earlier build of the game and ultimately doesn’t have too much bearing on the gameplay. I had a great time with it and it should prove to be an excellent addition especially at a time when decent game releases are hard to come by. Spec Ops: The Line hits stores on June 26, 2012.
At the core of your heart is your True Self, the spark of Love and Light. It is your true identity of who you really are at the deepest level of being, beyond all boundaries of space and time.
When: Saturday 18 February 2012, 10am
-”A phone call works too.”
The complex web of cliques and vast hierarchy of popularity come together on full display in high schools across the country just a few times per year - at the dance. There, every school's underlying caste system is paraded in all its glory to the tune of Journey, Styx, or whatever teen-anthem-makers are on the radio. Depending on where you happen to fit into this complicated system, this can be the greatest or worst moment of your life. I've lived on both sides of that equation, actually.
I watch fourteen and fifteen year old mamas in our neighborhood: babies holding babies, and I think I hear the Lord's heart faintly thumping, with promise and hope despite pain or perhaps because of it. I imagine another teenage mommy, over 2000 years ago. Her heart racing as she cradled her beautiful baby, counting his tiny toes and exclaiming to Joseph over his little fingers. I wonder at the pain she must have felt, knowing she held the Saviour, and knowing she would have to give up her son.
I’ve got some turnips and their greens and one bunch of curly kale left for this week, but I’m running out of ideas! We’re running very low on some pantry items, which makes it difficult to be very creative until we stock up again. It seems I’ll most likely be repeating some of the recipes above until then. (Unless any of you lovely readers have some inspiration for me!)
While the line was moving, the employees wrote down our first name on a post-it and placed it inside the book where she was going to sign. There were also other pretty strict rules which were kind of a bummer:
The Avengers are divided, both over how to approach Loki and the revelation that S.H.I.E.L.D. plan to harness the Tesseract’s power to develop weapons. Fury admits that the events in New Mexico a year before made S.H.I.E.L.D. aware of other races on other worlds, some of which may see Earth as an easy target. The decision was made to produce weapons with the Tesseract as a means of deterrence. As the group argues, Clint Barton and Loki’s possessed agents attack the Helicarrier, disabling its engines in flight. As Stark and Rogers attempt to restart the damaged engines,
“In The Wonderful Discoverie of Witches in the Countie of Lancaster”, Potts recounted how Jennet’s mother Elizabeth screamed out when her daughter entered the court. Jennet demanded her mother be removed and then climbed on a table and calmly denounced her as a witch.
We wear the mask!
Believe it or not, a simple pill natural herbal sex humiliating eliminating erectile dysfunction or impotence.
Scarf - Christmas gift
In the eighties, as she enforced shockingly harsh policies and led international debate on tearing down the Berlin wall, Thatcher was considered an “Iron Lady”. Today, while we enjoy more rights and career success than ever, I argue that each one of us needs a bit of “iron” in ourselves as we continue to make sure that the struggles of women in previous generations continue to provide more equality and freedom to every woman in the world.
It was with great sadness that the IPKat learned of the unexpected and early death this past weekend of Professor John N. Adams. A former Director of the Intellectual Property Institute and latterly a member of its Council, John was an author, a lawyer, a scholar and a genuine intellectual property enthusiast. He leaves behind him a lengthy list of publications, of which his works on franchising and merchandising had no competitors, a very large number of students and former students who had benefited from John's meticulous attention to matters of detail as to broad sweeps of principle -- and many, many friends.
In Barack Obama she had found a kindred soul, dislocated, caught in between. But she could see that this also led to distance and caution, a sensibility in Barack that she described with a particular metaphor: the veil.
Almost one year has passed since she passed away of a breast cancer recurrence.
Then, we headed to Grandma-nette’s house after church and had lots of good food and watched the kids hunt eggs in the rain and stomp in puddles in their Easter clothes. From there we made a quick trip home for our pup and headed to Maimee and PawPaw’s for more good food and egg hunting.
As well as stews, we ate pies; Monica was the world’s finest pastry cook, savory or sweet she had a delicate hand and her pastry was crisp and light and irresistible. We regularly had steak and kidney pie, or chicken pie with bacon. She made steak and kidney puddings with beef suet pastry and when the glorious shiny pud was cut open, a flood of aromatic specky gravy spread across the plate. Why the gravy in the puddings was specky I have no idea, maybe it was the kidney, but it was delicious. Sometimes we would have sausages and mash – with thick gravy at lunch time; sometimes we would have toad in the hole – with beautiful crisp, crunchy batter surrounding Powter’s’ sausages.
That word made a very important part of my life. Almost. I was almost happy. I almost had everything I wanted. I was almost successful. But never altogether. Never completely. And I never knew how to fix that thing. And moreover, I never ever tried.
However, it may turn out that the Public Option is the least radical change included in the Affordable Health Care for America Act. In Title VII, anyone making less than 150% of poverty will be eligible for Medicaid – which works out to $16k a year for an individual, and $33k a year for a family of four. What most people don’t realize is that as households, which average about 2.5 persons per household, 28% of American households make less than 150% of poverty per year.
Good evening all.i hope you are all well.brrr its a cold one again today and i have a bit of a stiff back tonight, think i must of slept strange last night.lol.
Well, it turns out that this year, The Harpist is NOT giving a St. Patrick's Day harp concert because she's managed to contract a series of bad viruses over the course of 7 weeks and she's been thinking solely about naps and tea and various over-the-counter remedies and what she can eat without suffering...repercussions...instead of thinking about Irish music. Sadly.
Note to self: Make sure before you listen to another of Mary's books on audio that it isn't Isabel Keating reading the story.
4. Spark Meetings
I entered the MeeGenius Author Challenge and would love your votes! The challenge is to write a picture book. Finalists are chosen by votes and the MeeGenius team. You can read my entry and vote here!
I've done it, I've gone two weeks without coffee! It's the best feeling. I feel normal. I'm not nervous or jittery, I'm less edgy or impatient. I'm just ME! No more once an hour bathroom breaks either.
X-Men: First Class was a pretty good movie. I mean, I'm a little burned out on superhero movies and I'm totally burnt out on origin story movies, and I'm probably also a little burnt out on tequila shooters I made with some flat root beer I found in the crisper last night, but that is irrelevant and I demand it be stricken from the record. (*takes off glass dramatically. points at cat*)
@ 21:00: 9 EUR Movie + Concert + Party
The clouds, the rain, the dews all rolled up
Also Like us on Facebook or Follow us on Twitter at @997NOW to find out where we are going to be striking next!!!
5. Sequence 5 (6:27)
Afrikaners increasingly targetted, abused, humiliated by black-racist ANC-officials
b. What you do when you’re sick after having kids: everything – and by that I mean cook, clean, bathe, feed, prepare, plan and execute all things baby related – and be sick. In other words: this SUCKS. Yeah, the hubby may be able to step in here, but it will probably be temporary. Let’s face it, most of us with small kids also have to work a lot to support such kids, therefore said hubby may only have a couple hours a day (if that) to tend to you. And for those working moms out there – the probability of you getting sick on the weekend is good for your work week, but bad because baby is there too. NOTHING prepares you for the first time you have to take care of someone else when you are sick. Do yourself a favor and line up the babysitters now.
what means a year of Life, ask a student, who failed his final exam
The food/cafe offer as part of a retail experience is now a hygiene factor. Events, demonstrations, activities, in-store theatres, bars and gardens are what’s needed. But only those with the right mind-set, belief and attitude can deliver them. Compare the lackluster sampling and demos seen in UK supermarkets to the browsing experience in the toy store Hamleys. Supermarkets are the biggest food retailers in the land yet their cafes are hardly temples of food love. Quite some improvement opportunity.
I had to call the police on a woman tonight for one of the most despicable displays of drunken rage I have ever witnessed.
There is not a soul that is ever ready for war. Sure, living in a city under siege, we quickly learned the mechanics of survival, and the constant military assault gave us the insight into civil defense. We grew accustomed to the deafening sounds of heavy artillery. Informed by experience, our ability to discern the orientation of attacks became ingrained. Instinctually, we knew when to take cover and when to ignore the whistling sounds of grenades as they crossed the airspace over our rooftops. And, on those days when our attention began to falter, fueled by deprivation of sleep and food, snipers offered a lasting reminder that our lives were at peril.
God gave His Son to win;
(root_nsu1c308)@/etc # cd
The report was penned by Dr Marion Pratt (Social Science Advisor) and Leah Werchik, J.D. (Human Rights Advisor) - with a team of 5 other women bureaucrats, and a host of Congolese women investigators. What’s also very significant about this report is that, though written by bureaucrats, it is bound one day to become a seminal academic conceptual tool in analyzing the phenomenon.
So keep Japan in your thoughts.
I don't know a hell of a lot about Papa Mali yet. But I plan on digging a little deeper as he seems like a cool cat. Check him and the band doing "Early in the Morning" down below.
I found great satisfaction in crossing tasks off my list as long as I gave myself enough time to do so. I think that's the trick with lists. One needs to be gentle with timelines. The lists morphed from lists of unfinished tasks to calculations on how much money I could save by a certain date. They morphed again when I printed out a map of Europe and taped it on the inside cover of my journal. My lists became names of places to visit.
Me "No i'm hurt you hurt me and your not listening"
I don't necessarily feel like a king after using La Coleur Royale, but I certainly feel more distinguished.
Week 5: Sunday, Oct. 7, at Carolina, 1:05 PM
The harvest is in! The bounty at the farmers markets is overwhelming right now and this will continue for several more weeks. I have bought my huge batch of plum tomatoes and will be making tomato sauce to pack away for winter. I have bought big batches of apples and will begin to cook them down for apple butter and pie fillings. I am plucking the last of the roses and sunflowers from my garden for casual arrangements all over the house.
J: Say's it's gonna be about 40 degrees.
When Sadie would laugh
The lever is pulled and the trapdoor drops as Mayleen opens fire. The crowd turns and the mayor screams for someone to disarm his daughter, but the town is standing agape at what they see. Mayleen has taken the barrel of the rifle and written in the dirt:
Try some of them and see the different results. Don’t forget, you can use more than one option at a time. For example, the number of lines without the words science or Science is
Evolution goes on, outside your blindfold.
Prankster: $100 VIP tickets (includes a special gift bag with the new book, The Daily Show with Jon Stewart Presents Earth (The Book): A Visitor's Guide to the Human Race, Highland Park Scotch Whiskey, Conservancy-shirts and more!)
Consider this: What should be the purpose of focused, creative, independent work? For a student to demonstrate that he/she understands the material, or for a student to generate a quality product that could stimulate a higher-level discussion or generate further higher-level independent or group work? Both purposes are important, but the second is clearly more valuable. You see, prolonged, focused, creative, independent work is crucial to the development of high-level thinking skills, whether those skills are then applied independently or in a group. But how do we get students with a low attention span to actually do this? Through consistent, scaffolded practice. Through the gradual building of stamina (ten minutes the first week, then fifteen, etc.). Through the use of incentives (having to share the work is a powerful incentive) and calming rituals/routines. You get the idea.
Bruce Wilson – That I would be available to read bedtime stories to the client. I’m not sure that his intentions were entirely noble.
Anyways....
One of the main causes of low employee morale is anxiety about the future, particularly long-term job, income and retirement security. Most of these scenarios are unreal and just anticipated . During these times listen, listen, listen. Often people just need a sounding board. Be visible and available to staff. Proactively schedule group discussion sessions, town meetings, ‘lunches with the manager’, or one-on-ones. Challenge pessimistic thinking and negative beliefs about people, the company, and the work area. Don’t let negative, false statements go unchallenged. If the statements are true, provide the rationale, the corporate thinking, and the events that are responsible for the negative circumstances. Share everything you know about a situation to build trust with the workforce.
Third – Evangelical essentially means one who promotes the Gospel. I do that, or at least I try to do that. While one’s understanding of what the gospel is may differ from another’s, the core point has to do with how we understand the Gospel. If it’s something to be shared/promoted, it’s an Evangelical framework, to be minimalistic.
If you'd like to DIY or don't think Labour's going to stay in power, then you might instead like to spend $1.99 on these instructions I found on ebay to make your own panels from scratch.
I almost die about 12 times a commute. Sometimes I must stop all the way in moving traffic to accommodate someone who is trying to get out of an exit only lane... or into a lane from an on-ramp... or who decided to just give up watching the road and wander their zillion-ton Denali into my very moving lane. Sometimes I must vear onto a shoulder or slam the gas pedal to the floor. And it pisses me off. every. time. An expletive is fired off. every. time. If I am sans-kids of course.
First: (tie) Seconds/The Train
John H. Hazen, president of the Holyoke, Massachusetts-based company said, “Hazen Paper is excited to have scored a touchdown with NewPage Sterling Ultra on the Stadium Edition Super Bowl Program Cover.”
I think of the words of the song “How He Loves” that say:
Only Merritt was close to the 44 second barrier last season at 44.06. Next best was Reny Quow at 44.53 - half a second behind! So lots of room to challenge for the top. And the potential to become a dominant force for the right 'sprinter". After all, while we tend to think of the sprints as being the 100 and 200, when you start averaging 11.00 sec or better for 4 consecutive 100's you're sprinting!
There was a time when we were known for our fruits.
In a few months, September will be in sight. The cactus will start to turn brown, and I'll be getting my suitcase out of the closet. All the while, Flying Dog Brewery will be making beer. A few of those barrels will be filled with Oktoberfest, which will eventually be transferred to kegs and bottles and be on their way to Arizona. Once they get here, I will take a little time off from packing and brushing up on my German so I can make a trip to the BevMo and Total Wine.
The 14-story affordable housing building proposed by Macedonia AME Church will begin its rise over downtown Flushing next month, but parking provisions did not go according to plan.
The Applicants distributed leaflets at an upper secondary school by leaving them inside student lockers. These leaflets described homosexuality as a “deviant sexual proclivity” that had “a morally destructive effect on the substance of society” and was the cause of HIV/AIDS. They were later convicted of “agitation against a national or ethnic group” and sentenced to a variety of penalties ranging from suspended sentences and fines to probation. The Applicants claimed that their conviction was a violation of their rights to freedom and expression as their goal was only to start a debate. The European Court disagreed.
Last night I had a lovely dream, but strange as it could be,
“I have been unhappy with the leadership of the BNP for some time and I feel the direction the current leadership are taking is not in the interest of the public.
Be on the lookout for a great GiVeAwaY for May. It's going to be awesome . . .
field I had trained in. So I packed my belongings and flew to Sydney. I knew I and made
John Milton (1608-1674)
Ted turns to Wesley, "The Crusher genes are as strong as ever. You're certainly not firing any blank cartridges down there!"
Murmur of maternal lamentation
Here is my newest daily painting! Unfortunately I painted this right before the downpour that is happening now and the light was very, very low. Not much value contrast, but I think I like the nice, soft color transitions.
It's been the big Pause Button time for the writing. Yes, the school holidays have hit. Last week included totally enjoyable family visitors visiting. There were meals and more meals, and a trip on a steam train, and a more than exciting time at the new childrens' play area in our local park. This was full of swingy swing things to knock out teeth, and roundabouts that could fling you off, and fantastic wooden structures to climb and get stuck or lost among. And a gigantic paddling pool. Just the place to relax and sit dreaming about aspects of one's plot. Not.
Here's something strange. I've never been to the top of the Eiffel Tower. I know! I can't believe it either. How could I have written 3 books about Paris and never looked out over the twinkling, shimmering skyline of Paris from the top of La Tour Eiffel?
Perhaps you could even assign building regulations from different cities to specific rooms in a single Manhattan high-rise; there's a London room, a New York room, a Moscow room. The whole thing a test structure or legal demonstration project. Architects and architectural students alike come through for tours of the rooms to see what effects, both large and small, a simple change in the rules can generate.
And the threshhold is basically how much your bassline will "duck" around the kicks.
One young gentleman (a very delicate porker with several straws sticking about his nose, betokening recent investigations in a dung-hill) was walking deliberately on, profoundly thinking, when suddenly his brother, who was lying in a miry hole unseen by him, rose up immediately before his startled eyes, ghostly with damp mud. Never was pig's whole mass of blood so turned. He started back at least three feet, gazed for a moment, and then shot off as hard as he could go: his excessively little tail vibrating with speed and terror like a distracted pendulum. But before he had gone very far, he began to reason with himself as to the nature of this frightful appearance; and as he reasoned, he relaxed his speed by gradual degrees; until at last he stopped, and faced about. There was his brother, with the mud upon him glazing in the sun, yet staring out of the very same hole, perfectly amazed at his proceedings! He was no sooner assured of this; and he assured himself so carefully that one may almost say he shaded his eyes with his hand to see the better; than he came back at a round trot, pounced upon him, and summarily took off a piece of his tail; as a caution to him to be careful what he was about for the future, and never to play tricks with his family any more.
A controversial taxpayer-funded “job centre” opened in Mali this week is just the first step towards promoting “free movement of people in Africa and the EU”.
For when I need it most,
* An interesting fact--a dog's pregnancy runs about three times as fast as a human's, so now that she's passed her first month she's reached the equivalent of her first trimester. She's starting to get swollen ankles and crave strange things to eat, like soap. Honest. Well okay, not the ankles.
New research and policy directions “
of human culture, distant in time but close
Now I am not so sure what make this soap base so special to do this technique and not sure why you cannot use any particular melt and pour base. But you can purchase a 2-lb. Swirlz (clear) for $7.80 directly from Go Planet Earth. The ingredinets for the clear soap base are Water, Sorbitol, Propylene Glycol, Sodium Stearate, Glycerin, Sodium Tallowate, Sodium Laureth Sulfate, Sodium Laurate, Sodium Cocoyl Isethionate, Sodium Cocoate, Triethanolamine.
2. Not Fade Away 5.22 (7/2)
In 2005, New Yorker and firefighter Matt Long was on his way to the Boston Marathon as he passed the NYC marathon with an impressive time of 3:13. Tragedy struck two months later as he was struck by a bus, injuring his hip.
Mrs Rigby agrees with Andrew M Brown in the Telegraph. She thinks Mr Blair looks old and, frankly, he also looks quite frail. She seriously recommends he slows down and very quickly realises money isn't the be-all and end-all. She thinks he needs to realise he's made enough to live a very comfortable retirement, and he'd probably be wise to spend his time in Ireland, where he might not need to pay as much in tax, and where his humongous property empire might eventually generate less IHT.
Hatred stirreth up strifes; but love covereth all transgressions.
Well, I'm off to have dinner with a friend. Have a fabulous night!
Before we get to the root causes, I feel it is necessary (for the sake of those who are not entirely familiar with this issue) to first discuss a few basic facts and features:
I brought you to a fertile land to eat its fruit and bounty, but after you entered, you defiled My land; you made My inheritance detestable. (Jeremiah 2:7)
Photographing hockey is one of the more difficult things I’ve tried shooting (besides little children who always want poke the front of my lenses). I recently shot two games for the Oregon Outlaws Hockey Club, and had a blast. I was able to shoot from wherever I wanted, which helped me in getting to areas people don’t normally see from in hockey games. I love shooting from the bench, that’s one of my favorites. You do have to be on the lookout for flying pucks and sticks though.
Right, Start off with a kick drum in Live.
The best thing about winter? Duh. Hot chocolate.
The first question that needs to be asked is what we are we fighting for? Reform or revolution? If it’s reform then let’s not bother. Reform for a system as twisted as this would be like that line from Apocalypse Now – “We cut ‘em in half with a machine gun and give ‘em a Band-Aid.” If we’re in it for the long haul, if we’re in it for revolution, if we’re fighting to turn an upside down world right side up then let’s answer the difficult questions that naturally would come from deciding that. For those of us struggling in the US the next question is what measures are we willing to take to achieve that revolution?
What things? Obadiah thought.
The first one is "Maybe". It's from the opening scene of the play. I'll set the stage for you, since you can't see it:
11/11 New Haven, CT @ Cafe Nine
Who is this talking? Whose commandments are these? The Ten Commandments are “thecommandments of God, and the faith of Jesus.” Rev. 14:12.
Wolf
slow to anger,
The lack of coherent narrative also raises questions as to why the author placed Tsar Alexander I at the center of his study. First, Schenk fails to make a convincing connection between Alexander and the radical religious ideas that emerged after the revolution and influenced the creation of the Holy Alliance. If Alexander was under the sway of this radical democratic Christianity, why did he allow Metternich to change the document and then sign it? Moreover, if for the author the Holy Alliance is crucial to the congress system, why is it also only examined in the first section? How does membership in the Holy Alliance affect the members’ political decisions concerning social unrest in Europe? This again relates to the lack of a coherent narrative by the author. Schenk spends a great deal of time explaining the religious ideas of the period and the creation of the Holy Alliance but fails to address these again until the epilogue in which they receive only brief attention. Overall, Schenk’s book appears to be a collection of essays that examine Europe during the congress system but ultimately fail to produce a coherent understanding of the period.
as he went right round the room, now all the 1′s can go to room A etc
In sum, please leave a comment with the genres you write and any other ideas or suggestions you have to make these agent interviews the best they can be.
And the recently-completed section of my town's bike and pedestrian trail that winds along the riverfront, through a wooded grove and across a renovated steel bridge, freshly planked and painted and intended for cyclists and foot-traffic only. Very nice.
The professor on the front row jumped up and said
* Carpet cleaning recipe:
Will we see the sun at last?
The authors also discussed the possible neural underpinnings of their findings. Studies of monkeys performing similar tasks suggest that intrinsic coordinates are encoded in primary motor cortex, whereas extrinsic coordinates are encoded in pre-motor areas. Primary motor cortex has short-range connections to somatosensory cortex, whereas premotor cortex has longer-range connections to the posterior parietal cortex. The authors argued, therefore, that the tendency of individuals with autism in their study to generalize more in terms of joint movement than hand direction was a function of impaired long-range connectivity.
We are also looking at production features for each e-reader so it plays on the format strengths. Nook is colour for example and as for the iPad, well, let your imagination run wild. I believe books will become much more interactive in the future as more and more books are read on tablets.
This stuff is quality.
165Black Melancholy sits, and round her throws
Her 12 month stats are:
Well today was an interesting day.
Look foward to your replies
That’s what’s going on with me right now. What about you?
Google is your friend, so find a recipe... any recipe... with that ingredient and make it. It could be something as easy as tofu or as unusual as smoked turkey legs. Think outside the box a bit and stop cooking the same old, same old!!!
Stormwind Steed – 100 Champion’s Seals
Beacon Sight through Fog
..when you meet a little girl named Katie, who has juvenile diabetes and her entire family is there to raise money for a cure.
So kids remember don’t drink and certainly don’t do drugs. Don’t forget to follow my outstanding example in abstaining from substance abuse.
Here’s to becoming a Class M planet all my own, so that should that day come, I will shine all the brighter, able to give life, as well as receive it. Right now, it seems like too much to hope for.
I know these days of refreshed pain are important. Too often I keep myself busy to minimize the pain, and there is no effective way to get around true grieving but to feel the pain and go through it. Or so I’ve been told. Reconnecting with the pain is also a way of reconnecting to him. The faster I go through the grief process, the further I get from him. The farther I get from him.
Well, all my hard studying paid off because I made the most delicious ciabatta bread. You wouldn't even know it was gluten-free. It's crunchy on the outside, soft and chewy on the inside. It toasts up beautifully and it tastes scrumptious. I added garlic and rosemary to simulate my favorite gluten ciabatta bread at Trader Joe's.
And now I’m off to see what the new internet’s like in 2012. Wish me luck, and enjoy the sun out there.
A quick stop at Le Meurice for more people watching, decor quizzing and birthday toasting before we left for the Gare de Lyon and our train home to Avignon. Upstairs in Le Train Bleu we sank into the comfort of their leather club chairs, made a few further toasts and waited for our train... the end to a pretty fabulous day and one that the three of us will remember for a long time...
Here are some resources that I thought were good:
Apparently, the government first approached Congress leaders Digvijay Singh (a heavyweight who mentors Rahul Gandhi), Prithviraj Chavan (close to the prime minister) and Salman Khurshid to join/head the panel. They refused. Hence the present “Team B” panel, without a proper chair of Cabinet rank. Given this hostile reception, it will be extremely difficult to persuade a senior politician to head the panel. His/her authority would already be dented by the absence of a chance to choose the other members.
One midwife boldly put it; “It takes two to be pregnant and so men as much as women need to be involved should we ever expect maternal mortality rates to reduce in Uganda.”
Something seemed just a little...I don't know..."off", I guess. Maybe it was something in her voice, or in her face. Or maybe it was just the way she carried herself - I don't really know, but looking back on it now I can distinctly remember thinking something just wasn't quite right about her that day.
2 applying
All sin is darkly beautiful.
Also, the issue isn’t the arena, it’s how the arena has been used to get politicians and the public on board for the larger project, which includes 16 towers. The arena would be only about one-tenth of the entire project.
Leather covered.
See, they get the joke.
Matt R: 2.5
I’d like to blame it all on Mary. She’s the wise and gracious blogger who signs herself “Grandmother” at Journeys into Elderhood. A couple of weeks ago she wrote here about a surprising discovery: Never a computer gamer, she now found herself spending hours on something called Dragonvale.
- The lyrics criticize the Internet culture.
I am not all that good at finishing short story collections. There are a few that look really great--really fun. It will just be sticking with the book from start to finish.
Carrot and Red Cabbage Slaw
The same feminist academics pooh-pooh concerns about the long-term effects of the hookup culture, arguing that it’s essentially just a harmless college folly, akin to swallowing goldfish, which young women will outgrow after graduation with no lasting scars. As long as they take precautions against disease and pregnancy, the current wisdom goes, it might even be good for you: a sort of rumspringa for the non-Amish in which you get your girls-gone-wild urges out of your system before you settle down to have babies.
Thankfully nobody needed anything.
And I edited this one.
I have gotten to know Karianne from Thistlewood Farm- and man is she a sweetheart! I asked her to share a before/after with us today, so she chose her delightful bathroom makeover. She wasn't blogging when they got her house- so she's short on "before" pics. But her "after" pics speak for themselves!
2pm arrives very quickly, and soon we’re in the car on the way down to Elstree Borehamwood. It’s not far, only about 20 minutes from my flat, and my wife and I happen to work literally around the corner from the studios, so we know the area very well.
Yippppee! It's National Library Week 2012!
Believe or not, eating and walking around an aquarium really takes it out of ya…
Without an iota of doubt in my mind, I live in the dumbest state of all 52 of 'em (Iraq and Afganistan are the two newest). I live in Arizona, where
Lunch - the children requested cheese on toast for lunch - not happening! Two slices of cheese on toast would have used up a persons cheese ration for a whole week, so we settled for jam!
*Baby sessions are scheduled during the 4th and 11th months (pushing up well through standing/walking)
“That does not look like the usual chimney smoke,” said Star. Indeed it was thick and black and did not look at all like chimney smoke.
Our anniversary trip to Kaua`i was everything we have dreamed of and more. It was even better than our honeymoon 3 years ago! Here are some of the highlights:
then is ejected out behind, still, a miracle, alive, but spinning wildly onitself, tearing,
As always we'll be giving away PRIZES as well to THREE lucky Hoppers!!!
I had fun colouring this image because I got to use my copics again ... it seems that it's been a long time since I've used them on a regular basis, so it feel good to colour again! As you can see, I followed the awesome sketch by Carla and at the same time created a Spotty Dotty card for the challenge! What a happy day. One more close up ...
It is commonly argued, in defiance of emerging facts to the contrary,4 that crime is an equal opportunity offender in South Africa: whites, blacks and browns are all in it together. What is incontrovertible, however, is that, where economic opportunities are concerned, the minority that dare not speak its name is on the wane. White males, strictly speaking, are not supposed to comprise more than ten percent of the payroll in a South African company. As during apartheid, a class of people is being dispossessed because of their pallor.
At the end of the day. When I'm wrapped up in the mere memories of the hard-earned day, my head is on the pillow. I know my Heavenly Father is only a whisper away. And while my husband's embrace is long and tender...when we're left to whisper loud into the deaf ears of the other because sleep has long since carried one of us off into La La land. What matters most is that, in the end, I have been faithful.
I notice this especially at lunch: nobody can just carry their sandwich or salad in their hands—they have to have a bag, sometimes both paper and plastic, to walk back to their office. This drove me crazy in NYC.
What could be a more entertaining read than the perils of a group of women at a slimming club? After all, you always hear such horror stories about diet groups; they couldn't possibly all be true, right?! And what a fantastic time, around the New Year to have released a book focused around diets, even if completely fiction, it is still the time we are all trying to lose a few pounds after gorging ourselves over the Christmas period.
Oh, time enough when the blood runs cold,
I also have to say Catherine Cookson, although to tell you the truth, I haven’t read even one of her books. Hmm? How does that work? Well, a whole series of adaptations of her books were made by British producers ITV, many of which have become some of my favourite British historical dramas. The writing in all of them is so layered, and I never saw the character arc reveals coming. Favorites from those: The Girl (with Jonathan Cake), The Gambling Man (with Robson Greene) and The Fifteen Streets (with Sean Bean.)
I was thinking that it might be too self-serving to suggest we read my unschooling manifesto, but maybe the group can tackle Grace Llewellyn's Teenage Liberation Handbook.
In one plan a complex extended from First to Third, and San Antonio to Colorado. A 282,000-square-foot City office building faced Second at Guadalupe and Lavaca, with a plaza in the block south of it. To the west were two large office buildings, and to the east either an office building or a hotel.
Last year, as pay freezes continued for U.S. federal employees, some 4,800 New York-based UN staff received a three-percent pay raise. When Joseph Torsella, Washington’s envoy for UN reform, called for the “inappropriate” salary hike to be rescinded, the independent commission responded by ratcheting up salaries in Geneva, Rome, Paris, London, Tokyo and a score of other cities.
Any way the card that I would like to share today has been one of those on off projects that I cant quite make up my mind about. Take a look and let me know what you think.
Bloodgroup - Chuck
We're going where the action is! We'll not only be on the GABF festival floor, but from many of the events outside the festival proper. In fact, some of the best parts of the GABF experience are these off-site parties, special tappings and get togethers hosted by breweries from around the country.
Shrugging on capes and dimming down their sparkles, we exit vampires, at long last.
IN THE MEANTIME OUR PEOPLE ARE BEING MURDERED LIKE FLIES! WHITE PEOPLE, CHRISTIAN PEOPLE, NON-CHRISTIAN PEOPLE ARE DYING LIKE NOWHERE ELSE ON EARTH!
Instead of integrating the masses – by exposing people spread across the world to diverse cultural influences, and bringing these same people into close contact with foreign ideas and products – the Internet is in fact polarizing them. Instead of creating a homogeneous society, nationalism, regionalism and tribalism are all on the rise, according to journalist Michael Kimmelman:
Roosevelt's key ally was not Strong but our old friend Jacob Riis. With Riis' guidance, loathsome and unsafe police homeless shelters were shut down. It was the influence of Riis, through his close associate Roosevelt, that enabled Strong through recently passed state laws to finally tear down the tenements of Five Points.
The story began with a sweet and nostalgic story between two teenagers who had been secretly meeting for three years and were using the alternative names "Cinderella" and "Jack" in order to keep their identities a secret. When things between them became more serious, Cydney's werewolf nature suddenly decided to morph and unfortunately for her, she had to leave the area immediately. But she had spent the past three years living with regrets and recriminations and felt that the time has come to face her fears and her previous actions and return to the place where it all began. I adored Cydney's personality and character and thought how sad it was she had to go through life always being looked at and feared because of her wolf personality. Even her Aunt, representing the evil stepmother but who was not really evil, displayed her fear of her on more than one occasion through her actions and her words. I couldn't imagine going through life always having those you love being fearful of you and how you might react.
Road yet unknown.
To Donate to our team please visit:
Furthermore, never believe those who tell you that not going to college resigns you to a lifetime of ‘flipping burgers’. The perpetuators of this myth are usually none other than the school faculty and administrators who are completely dependent upon your continued support of higher education for their continued employment. The vast majority of people I know who have chosen to forgo college for the time being are doing amazing things like writing grants, traveling the world, working on farms, or doing web design.
I'm pretty sure every family has them both... The person who squeezes the toothpaste & carefully rolls up the tube after they're done. AND the person who squeezes the tube every which way & leaves it a mess. You know which one you are, right? Hee hee. I'm a roller. :)
Willow
Without the photograph and the grave marker, seemingly all physical traces of Mildred Packer had now been removed from the town.
In Traci’s case, I can honestly say that we never discussed SUDEP. [Note: what I meant here was we didn't discuss the term SUDEP or the risk factors as they might apply to her.] Was she herself aware of it? The only tangible evidence I have is a link I found on her laptop to an article about mortality in epilepsy. I have no doubt that she knew about it; we even talked about it when 15-year-old Jordan Fawcett’s death from SUDEP was covered in our local newspaper, but I cannot say how extensive Traci’s knowledge was. It’s possible she may have thought she was at a lower risk than she really was, or she may just have decided not to concern herself with it.
Step 7: On yet another text layer (you know how), add a giant fancy ampersand (much cooler than boring old "and"), and then use the text menu bar to change the size and the color.
3 among
Many St. Louis fans are very happy with his demise. They want him to fail. They are laughing at him. I think that is vindictive. True, Albert was “all talk” regarding his love for the city and his desire to remain there his entire career. And he wasn’t honest in his dealing with the public. But it does no one any good to be mean about it. I wish I were above all feelings of “that’s what you get”. I’ll have to work on that.
Hi Jen, it's Jen!
Alright all you dog lovers out there, and I know there’s plenty of you, here’s one you’ve been waiting for. Allie Larkin’s novel, Stay, is the perfect read for pet fans and book lovers alike. People magazine called it a “feel good debut!” Grab your four-legged friend and curl up with this one, it’s a winner!
And moved on you have, currently dwelling somewhere between sadness and heartbreaking disappointment. How does someone you know seemingly overnight become the person you use to know? How?
Why should my blog followers join the Frenzy next year?
Stone Brewing Co. Stone Smoked Porter
Governor Romney talks about the private sector and how he’s going to bring private sector. When the private sector was in trouble, he voted for government to come in and take over the private sector and be able to — and to bail them out.
This has been going on since we moved in (we've been here 3 years mind you), so I finally started opening her mail about a year ago because it started to bug me THAT MUCH. I had just assumed that they were trying to collect money or that it was general correspondence, but nooooo....she's going to the doctor A LOT, and I'm getting the current summaries of benefits paid out by BCBS. So I called BCBS and they told me they can't change her address unless SHE changes it which I totally understand, but I'm SICK OF IT.
The first couple of weeks were pleasantly chaotic, getting ourselves organised, getting to know people, finding our way around, making first friendships. One of the organisational things which had to be done was the election of representatives of First Arts to the Students Union. There was some kind of address from the Union people in Theatre L, the largest of the lecture theatres, after a history lecture, and people interested in being candidates were invited to speak to the gathered multitude. Nobody was taking the whole affair all that seriously and there was a considerable buzz of conversation among the couple of hundred students assembled. Suddenly a strange, freakish figure gambolled up to the microphone and announced excitedly,
1 framed
This thriller isn't always thrilling, but it's not bad either. Pamela Franklin is beautiful and natural as Jane, while Michele Dotrice as Cathy is not quite as beautiful or talented, but she shows a little bit more skin to make up for it. Sandoe Eles, who plays Paul, seems like a real cool character, smooth and shadowy at the same time. All of the locals are a little off-kilter, and you get the sense that all of them are hiding something, and any one of them could be behind Carol's disappearance.
God bless and No surrender
Here are some photos on day 2 of my adventures in Nashville:
But as usual, I am stressing on getting my pieces completed. I am doing small landscapes this year. Small, I mean 4x5 and 5x7 size!!
The action in the film is top notch and exhilarating. Every character gets a moment of exciting action that will get your adrenaline pumping. Joss Whedon’s eye for these scenes really gives the film a perfect momentum that all leads to the final battle in Manhattan. Without saying too much, the last act of this film is nerd nirvana. You’ll want to watch it over and over again.
Peleman has been in business for 69 years – superior quality of printing and binding.
A much needed quality and inspiration in the final third which has benefitted all of his previous clubs, not to mention Scotland on the international stage.
Lee Harris shows how conservatives engage opposing ideas in an intellectually honest way. He gives props to OWS “anti-leader” David Graeber, treats him as the intelligent human being that he is, and seriously considers his intellectual ideas, the most provocative among them, that we are all naturally communists.
Dr Fox says that there would be "interoperability" so strike fighter aircraft from allies such as France could land on UK aircraft carriers, and vice versa.
Legality
Full thoughts after the jump…
The state commission, which investigates allegations of negligence or misconduct involving forensic labs, set no deadlines during Friday's meeting in Austin.
Have I told you guys that we're heading off on vacation in a few days? If not, we are, and man am I excited! We haven't been away since our honeymoon 4+ years ago and though we'll be gone less than a week, I am so looking forward to it. Our plans mostly consist of eating good food, soaking up the sun by the pool and taking in the sites - all the hallmarks of a good vacation in my book. I won't lie and tell you I'm not dreading the 6 hour flight just a little bit because I am. I don't have a fear of flying, but I really dislike being cramped in a tiny seat for such a long time (though this will certainly be easier than our overnight flight to Iceland many years ago - poor Shane, I was the worst. companion. ever). Before our plane takes off, there are of course a million and one things last minute things to do - shopping for clothes and reading material, cleaning up a bit (because I hate returning from vacation to a messy house), and packing, to name a few.
I have so many things to be grateful for
When I got off the train, I checked my lottery numbers at a nearby newsagent and discovered that I’d won some money – only a very small amount, but it was an amusing surprise nonetheless.
On March 1, it was announced that the Purple and Gold had come to terms with Governor Mark Dayton and legislatures to have a stadium built for them in Minnesota. If passed, the deal will secure the Norsemen in the North Star State for the next 30 years, so fans don’t worry because this franchise will not move to L.A. The new stadium has been proposed to be built in Ramsey County on the site of the Twin Cities Army Ammunition’s plant. It will be modeled after the Lucas Oil Stadium in Indianapolis, supposedly. Until the field is built, the Vikes will be playing in the Metrodome for the next two years and in the TCF Bank Stadium of the University of Minnesota for the last year of construction.
I would like people to have read what this world is like before reading the actual main fantasy novels. What I have created, charted and brainstormed is quite magical. And when I say magical, I mean that it has flare. You would be able to tell that I’ve worked really hard to create this new world; well if I showed you the paper it fills, that is.
Wang said Fang’s wife informed him of the sudden death of the democracy and human rights activist, who was nicknamed “China’s Sakharov” in a comparison to Soviet physicist and fellow civil liberties advocate Andrei Sakharov.
First off, lovelies, I am so overwhelmed by all the blogs i have signed up for (which i love), and all the bullshit i’ve been writing (which is all over the place), i don’t know which way is up. There are MILLIONS of great blogs out there, and i feel compelled to read every single one. NOT ENOUGH TIME!
Last week, I experienced three hours of pure auditory hell. The owner of the shop I was in had their personal iPod on shuffle. By “shuffle” I mean it was in the throws of an identity crisis and was committed to taking everyone down with it. No one in the room, including the long-suffering staff, knew how they were supposed to feel – other than incredibly anxious. The owner didn’t see that there was a problem and refused to change it or turn it off.
After using for 2 weeks, O showed zero allergies. Thus it would definitely be a product I will consider using besides Mustela.
Wear Kelly Green to Really Make a Scene
There is a further problem here. It is that opponents of enhancement move far too quickly from claims about what is natural for human beings to claims about what ought to be the case for human beings. Anyone who is familiar with ethics and metaethics will know that moves of this sort are dubious.
Up until a few weeks ago Paranormal Activity would have been a lot higher on the list but I watched it with some friends after seeing it in theatres when it was first released. On my recent second viewing, it really didn't get to me. It felt like being at a dinner party and watching the couple who's hosting it fight. After you get past the scares the movie works as an interesting examination of a relationship in a tailspin, a tailspin on fire. But when I first saw it I was scared for weeks. It is eerie and unsettling. The noises are just familiar enough to happen in your own room and since most of the crazy stuff happens when they are sleeping, which is when we are of course most vulnerable, it adds new meaning to "never sleep again". Needless to say my friends who saw it a few weeks ago were rightfully freaked out, but I slept like a baby that night.
To duty its noblest fulfillment
I decided I will be making a helpful guide for NEStalgia (Note: NOT Nostalgia) as I go through the game. Mainly, the secrets they don't want to be told. They have some general guidelines on their wiki thing, so if you need to know when a spell is learned or what special stat bonuses you can get, that's the place to go. If you wish to gather all the treasure from the secret passages they have, navigate the mazes without trial and error annoyances, and so on, this is where to turn. I did something similar for another BYOND game, Archipelago Remastered by giving away all the recipes you need to know for the game.
This is what I did with the label.
So hopefully I’ll be another pound lightrrr on Friday. With me eating 1000 calories I’m deficient in 7000 calories a week then I should lose 2 lbs a week. Seen as there are 3500 calories in a pound. I think
What a beauty! The Blue colorway is based on Caron Collection Watercolours Elderberry, one of our favorites, and is stitched on Aquamarina canvas. Look at the threads:
have a great one
Ah, finally. We get to my list of all-time favorite movies. This is in my top five. I love this movie with all of my heart. I asked myself what I would say about this strange, original movie and here is what I think. I am not a huge fan of romantic comedies. I don’t really like the same ol’ same ol’ storyline that you can practically predict. Instead, I like the movie that shows what love is really like. This movie is a love story, but not in the classic way. It is a love story in a true way. The way that real love is nuts. You do things you never thought possible when you are in love. Love is absurd and makes people nuts. This film shows that.
White cs (Neenah)
Belinda Rowlands, farm manager at VSA’s Easter Anguston Farm, said: “We are so excited to be a NEOS venue again. It gets better and better every year. We’ve already attracted some great local talent for 2012 and, as usual, we’ll be celebrating the creativity of VSA service users, displaying artwork from Easter Anguston Farm trainees and Friends for Life clubs’ children with additional support needs.”
A name that used to mean something, Rotten Sound's content to repeat themselves as long as you're content to listen.
Before Seagate - 48.2% (66 of 137 cases)
Well, Jack, let’s look at it this way. Suppose John Jones is an active young man. John has 4 girlfriends and they all shack up together in the same house, sharing the food, the chores, the rent, and all having consensual sex together (I’ll leave it up to you to decide who’s doing whom). Is there a law against this? Does anybody care? I could care less.
Yesterday the IESEG School of Management said the total losses could reach €66.4bn for France and €89.8bn for Germany. “Assuming that the new national currency would depreciate by 50pc against the euro, which is realistic, the losses for French banks would reach €19.8bn. They would reach €4.5bn for German banks,” it said.
Here's to another week of no nail biting!
At 12 miles it was raining so hard I didn't want to get the phone out to take a picture, but by that point (well, with 3km to go precisely) I had realised that it was possible to get sub-1.50, and I'd started "going for it" a bit - but not too much, to keep in with my philosophy of not trying too hard on this one.
I have to admit I was pretty nervous. So many thoughts and emotions kept going through my head- I can only imagine how she felt. We sat in the car waiting and waiting, ready to give up when all of a sudden I looked up and saw a family standing near the side of the street and our eyes met. There was something about her- something so familiar. Then suddenly I felt myself needing to look away because the look of saddness I saw in her eyes pierced through me like a sword. Eyes that told a story of a loss deeper than any I could ever imagine. This woman, who had given me one of the most precious gifts I have ever been given, stood before me now, dirty, unkept, and yet beautiful all at the same time. A woman to whom I owed- more than I would ever be able to repay.
Ah yes: Thanksgiving- that is a holiday that was started by the Native Americans and then “borrowed” from them, you know, kind of like the rest of their culture (and continent). People may not like to admit it, but reality can be harsh. While you’re being grateful for food and family and a solid building you call home, I’m not going to ask you to remember the turkeys that gave their lives or the people who called this land their home several hundred years ago. That kind of sentimental musing is pretty-well covered in public schools already, right? Kids make turkey drawings from outlines of their hands. I did it, too. Yes, it is STILL cute and yes of course your child is still the most amazing artist in human history.
AEI, Oil & Gas, Deal Details 9
When everything is cool, I half the chicken stock and put it in two separate plastic containers, covered in my refrigerator.
It is at this stage that I will divert sideways and talk about polygamy and, in a sense, affairs and wife swapping (the politically correct way to say “swinging”). Yes, I know you purist and closed minded people out there hate to hear these words, but think about it this way. In a “non-traditional American couple” one needs to have a better outlook on how to keep one’s self in order to continue to attract the desired mates. These couples will be our best hope during the Zombie Apocalypse and (if this conjecture holds true) will be the ones to repopulate the Earth, assuming some survive. Argue all you want now, but I don’t think there’s much more I need to say.
"Alpha Star Burger" is the name of the place and they are under new management.
I suppose you could call this a zombie novel, which is why it is all the more extraordinary that I am including it in this list. Anybody who knows me even slightly will be aware that I loathe zombies like the plague. But what Marr has done with this novel is a laudable feat of re-imagining the genre, and I salute her for it (whilst still shuddering gently). Rebekkah Barrow is the reluctant inheritor of her grandmother Maylene's post as Graveminder to the small town of Claysville, where the dead are walking, unquiet and needing to be laid to rest. This is a new departure for Marr, best known for her Wicked Lovely faery series, and I will be fascinated to see where she takes Rebekkah's story next.
and tried to imagine the kind of life where
~George Herbert, 1633
than
So, then tonight, I was awake because a neighbor was taken by ambulance, so I was awake thinking about her, and turned to Jay Leno for some solace…and it worked quickly in the form of Jay Leno and Steve Martin.
God is good.
This week’s theme for the P 52 Photography Challenge is – Fiesta or Siesta. Really having no idea what I was going to post for this picture, I started going through all the pictures I took this week while we were on a field trip to an Arboretum a couple hours away from us. The Arboretum was so much fun but the temperature dropped quickly and we had to cut our visit a little short. I hope we can go back again soon; there are so many more areas to explore.
Open your eyes, look within.
Geothermic soldiers
This crafty goodness was actually a happy accident. I was trying my best to make a hot air balloon decoration for my sons room out of yarn using liquid starch, a balloon and a wire frame that I had created. Because the project was taking me much longer than anticipated I had to stop about half way through. The first part dried, the balloon shrunk, and I was left with deep disappointment. I had failed and the project sat unfinished for weeks. I finally decided to cut the yarn off the frame thinking that I might make a fabric cover for the wire frame. As I was snipping I saw what looked like gorgeous feathers but because the wire was smooth the yarn would not stay put.
My watch died on me by the second loop. I ran without knowing my actual pace. Like many would say, more than anything else, it’s important to run with one’s heart. And so, I did...I think.
(Drum roll please)
Add enough water to lime juice to measure 1 1/3 cups. Beat cake mix, softened butter, lime juice mixture, lime peel and eggs in large bowl with electric mixer on low speed 30 seconds. Beat on medium speed 2 minutes, scraping bowl occasionally. Pour into pans.
Why? What’s wrong with being comfortable, as long as it’s the ‘good’ kind of comfort?
Here’s what I suggest: If you want something sweet and indulgent, go ahead and make the full fat version. Honestly, it’ll satisfy the craving. But, if you just want something to satisfy your sweet tooth without overdoing it, try this recipe (I came up with it myself!!!)
Last but not least...
Then I get comments hassling me about the bucket o' pies post that was only up for a few minutes and telling me to get on with it.
Justin "Buster" Grant, is chair of the Association of Welsh Independent Brewers, which was founded in 2007.
first-class travel for life at any price.
As soon as I have them I will post them here and on Flickr. If it is Betty Driver I would like to try and return them to her.
Here is the link to where you can purchase it, and I hope that all of enjoy it!
Last year I had many passionate students come to my door and ask for support for the scholarship program that was out there- to support that. And I had many passionate university instructors and staff from across the university. And I found it amazing that there was a large disconnect in where the dollars from the state of Alaska comes from on a regular basis as far as the production of oil on the North Slope and how that is turned into revenue for the state of Alaska and in turn is invested in the university system.
"Don't worry love, we've done a few of these today and you're the last one" the woman said, picking up the syringe.
-Having a person say "I had a huge crush on you in high school" (boy or girl) and maybe following it with "you were really pretty then" or something (should I be flattered?)
Thyroid cancer may have taken away Roger Ebert's voice but it only enhanced his ability to tell a story. Life Itself is a must-read for anyone who considers himself an afficianado of film, books, newspapers, or history. Does that about cover it? Do yourself a favor and spend some time with Roger. You'll find that he's like an old friend that you haven't seen in a while but can strike up a conversation with immediately. Follow his blog at the Sun Times
And when it looked like this, it was intended on being updated. This picture was taken in July of 2010. What were we going to change? Mainly, the standard dated media unit. It was from a big box store from when we moved in. It was falling apart, it was small for the space and it was not in line with my style any longer. So what was the big plan you asked? Why, I wanted to do a HUGE wall of built in white bookcases and/or a media unit of some sorts! And it was gonna be grand....
Although I was raised Catholic (and, admittedly, no longer practice and attend church only on Christmas Eve to be with my brother and his family and listen to my young niece sing in the choir), I cannot bear what the modern day Catholic church has done with the hymns. Talk about bland.
Well, in theory, it's simple. In reality it's hard. It's a simple concept that's difficult to master.
As a Commissioner on the Board of Commissioners of Public Lands, I, along with Attorney General J.B. Van Hollen and Secretary of State Doug LaFollette, get to help Wisconsin communities by providing loans via the State Trust Fund Loan Program.
New Studio
Well now that it was my birthday I promised myself I would straighten my life out. While driving around at lunch the thought came that if my life was a movie this would be the beginning where you see a frousy girl doing her everyday tasks and some moving emotional song would be playing in the background. Perhaps something by Jewel, Alanis Morissette or Natasha Beddingfield. The potential is limitless for where this story could go. ( I don't even know where it's going...)
Cheryl and I spent the day talking, crying, and at times even laughing with amazement at God’s way of putting two needy women together. After dropping her off at the end of the day, I went home, immediately opened the directory, and called her.
Besides it is now hard to find a BN bottle of Toxic Seawead.
I know many church leaders right now are thinking “Oh! Come on Jeff!” believing my last paragraph to be unfair. Tough noogies. You’ve made it clear that to have a healthy relationship with God people need to be part of a church. You are the one responsible for making the connection between God and participation in your congregation. You dug the hole. Now you have to sit in it.
When I am done silently emptying myself, it is then that I look up and see the flowers that have been placed on all the other gravesites. As far as I could see there were flowers, crosses and other memorials. Some had left stuffed animals and there were little flags flapping in the wind. And as I began to look around I saw the people; an elderly man placing flowers on a grave of perhaps his wife, a young woman kneeling at a site with her head bowed, a family surrounding a site, heads bowed, a man standing alone at a site looking off into the distance and a man helping an elderly woman, perhaps his mother, to place flowers on a site.
One of the reporters butted in and asked, “Sino crush mo sa kanila? Si Anthony o si David?“
Adding to downfall of their culture is Eliot’s’ references to the downfalls of the cultures of capitals of some major empires in the past: “Falling towers Jerusalem Athens Alexandria Vienna London Unreal”
Now on to my post.
– a half-smoked menthol cigarette
Here is the first name: "Faithful and True" (Rev 19:11). This is actually a title. This title was used for Jesus in His letter to the church in Laodicea: He is "the faithful and true witness" (Rev 3:14). The words "faithful" and "true" basically mean the same thing – that Jesus is reliable, altogether trustworthy, and dependable. He is faithful and true in carrying out God's judgments against the dragon, the beasts, and the unbelieving.
There are a few reasons that I'm doing this...
The following ‘paragraph’ comes from an essay I wrote for an English class back in high school. I always ‘ace’ (A+) English class and so looking back now, I wonder whether my teacher read a word of what I wrote. However, writing for the teacher is different from writing for a blog. In a blog you need to capture attention, not put your reader to sleep. (Don’t read the following, just observe the mass of text. Read what follows instead.)
All these streets are turning into squatter slums.
Hail all you mortals. Faery Alex here. I’m sitting in the dressing room of the West End Theater awaiting my que to pop on stage. We are having a 10 hour rehearsal today so my exhaustion is setting in and I feel slap-happy. I’m making up spontaneous dances and I can’t help but create songs with farting noises. I’ve officially hit the wall and need to relax on the couch with a cold beverage (preferably alcoholic. ). I’m almost there. Must stay focused…. I know! I’ll tell you about what I did yesterday. I recently got an IPAD so I have been procrastinating life in general while playing games and being a drone to Facebook. I am the person that keeps the plastic on new objects as long as possible so it stays so fresh and so clean. Due to the constant use of my new toy I realized I probably need a cover to protect Prefontain (my IPAD’s new name.). I went to multiple stores looking for a damn case and was appalled by the ridiculous prices on just a piece of cloth to cover Prefontain. The lowest price was $50. It’s unbelievable the amount of money we spend on technology just to keep up with the world. I have decided to put the cover on the back burner for now and just carry Prefontain in its original box. Yes I might look strange but I will find him a good home when the right time comes. Later that night I went to see my friend Anatol’s play called Massacre: Sing to your Children. It is a new play written by Jose Rivera. Click on his name so you can see his other works. The play was phenomenal. It was modern, scary, and had a few twists that made you want to shrink down in your seat and peek through your hands that covered your eyes. Well, maybe that was just me. Maybe I am biased but Anatol’s performance was flawless. His excellence as an actor is humbling so, if you are available this month check out this show. You won’t be disappointed.
I have wowed,
Brennan asked if the city could authorize increasingly more tax-exempt debt, given that the cost is mainly to federal taxpayers.
So now how do you feel about all those sacrifices you had to make to get as much money as you could to the Church?
1. Someone's drinking is causing problems at home and a husband/wife/mom/dad doesn't want to put up with them anymore, so they drop them off, stick around for an hour or so, and then head home, saying they won't take them back tonight. Disposition: Detox.
Three in ten people think it has been much more pleasant going to pubs since the smoking ban.
I am still an active demo, thank you all so much for your loyalty. This is what makes me want to do my 'thing' again.
Many people have asked me what possible motivation I had for getting my Bachelor’s Degree in English. I get the sneaking suspicion that many people think it is a waste of time. Why get a degree in English when you could have a career as a teacher or a scientist? Aren’t those degrees far more worthwhile than a little degree in English that you’re never, ever going to do anything with? My simple answer to those questions is, “No.”
Time to let go the last great step
Then, suddenly I was in City Court and some of the women judges I’ve appeared before came out in a line, hand in hand, doing a Rockettes routine. Okay, now I’m stretching it a little bit, that last part didn’t really happen.
930 *D-II/20/1986. “Education, Television, and Political Discussion in America.” Interview conducted by Donald McDonald, Center for the Study of Democratic Institutions, Santa Barbara, California. (Incorporated in Item C-1986(5), above.)
If he has spare brainpower to be able to think about the scary corner, he isn't thinking hard enough about what I'm asking of him.
2. PoetessWug
So what is it we want? The 250+ people who join had something in mind when they signed up, how can we meet those needs and more for ourselves in this field? Shall we stick with Ning until they give us a final word on premium networks for education? Shall we discuss what it is we really want/need from a social network for teachers of learners with severe or multiple disabilities (and then match features to find a new platform)? Any suggestions or ideas? For those 2,000 or so readers who aren't on the Ning, what would you need to join in a social network, personal learning network or listserv?
Here is my DT inspiration for you:
This was also the date of the ending of the Battle of the Somme in World War I and the birthday of US actor Steve Zahn. Coincidence? Yes, completely.
Democracy is prefereble to any other kind of government:
Morning, chickadees!
Hard to see, but my very dear friend made that coat rack for me several Christmases ago. Since I didn't send on the engraved leather halter I had made for Farno, or his engraved stall sign, I decided to clean them up and put them out...so I brought home Jetta's engraved halter and stall sign too.
But that's not really it. I've always been a bit of a weirdo when it comes to shifts in language. For example, it irritated the hell out of me when people started pronouncing Uranus as yer-uh-nus just because we're all a bunch of mental adolescents who can't help but giggle at the name of a planet. This is what happens when people acquire Latin skills. When we just called it a a butthole, poor old YOURANUS didn't have to be embarrassed hanging out there in space.
Of gray days and lonely nights.
DA MP Dianne Kohler Barnard said: “The absolute top structure (of SAPS) had sworn to us on stacks of Bibles that a system was in place. Now you mean there’s no system?
"Right, I've been patient enough, fuck off you cunt".
“Need me,” he screams.
But I have limitations: I don’t want to sew, pay more than $25 or be cold. Ideas thus far:
Dayton, in a talk at the Washington Institute of Near East Policy talked about the three battalions of Fatah soldiers he's already trained and the plans for eight more.
903 comments
I used my wee butterfly punch and added some pearls to their bodies.
It's the same with life.
Hi Readers: So here’s a “helpful” article on how to keep our kids safe from predators. It cites the oft-repeated notion that when we make our kids hug or kiss relatives, the kids get the message that from now on they must submit to any and all skeevy and revolting requests adults make of them.
2 tablespoons Grand Marnier liqueur
I fully acknowledge that Mr Hagmann is not an unbiased source, however, when you look into this matter it becomes clear that very few of the sources on either side are unbiased, including those who claim to be “independent”. Therefore, so as to judge this issue, one has to rely on the quality of the analysis, rather than any claimed neutrality on the part of the analyst.
Sadly due to my injury (see last post) I am very limited on exercise.
The night, however, was not without its disappointments. Our latest drama, The Edge, was nominated in 4 different categories, but sadly walked away empty handed. I felt so bad for their producer, Mia, especially since I had usually been with her in the office editing as late as her, sometimes she would stay longer. Her efforts to get a show out weekly (which in terms of a student TV drama, is near impossible) deserved credit, that sadly never came. Also, Open Mic was unable to achieve notice, despite it being the longest running show in NUTS history. Then again, I’m sure those who did not win anything for Best Sport (again, 21 entries total) also felt the same when they were unsuccessful. It’s a harsh time, to be told that your work has not amounted to recognition. In my eyes, though, everyone in NUTS has done a fantastic job and I am incredibly privileged to have met, known and worked with you all.
HEY! I hope you enjoyed that little letter there at the top. ^^^ I was doing some makeup work and I was thinking how summer is almost here and I AM SO EXCITED! I HATE SCHOOL! Except my friends, who I love dearly. I mean, we are at school for 8 hours. Then, we come home to more of it. What the Heck! Am I the only one that feels this way? I think not. ^_^ -_- ^_^
So, I decided to make some pita chips and serve as a Tapas platter.
A horde of bougainvillea will be the welcoming hostess…their bright colors alluring the landscape…
Am I perfect – not even close, but I am loveable and loved unconditionally and that is more than enough! All along I had thought what I wanted/needed so desperately was to be perfect; what I had really wanted was to be unconditionally loved. God removed the barrier to receive what had been mine all along and continues to be mine every minute of every day. Do I still aim for excellence in what I do, absolutely! But, when I miss I can still love me; still receive God’s love and still receive the love from those around me … such a deal!
But I knew I’d be all right somehow I just knew everything would be ok. Although the other part of me was literally terrified, scared that Clayton wouldn’t like me once we met and vice versa too.
Credits: Photography: Jason Schembri Styling: Patricia A. Troll Models: Eliza Dabron and Shani Jayamanne Makeup: Julie Duong
When I create, I am often inspired by old things, such as T shirts, to make new things, but not always. Sometimes, new fabrics and materials inspire me as well. I mostly make things for children--cloth diapers, diaper covers, fleece training pants, and knit wool play food--but occasionally you'll find an adult hat, pair of knit socks, or a Christmas ornament here as well.
Shipyard Brewing Co. Shipyard Export Ale
I'm a little tired of being rejected. I'm also past the make-out clock's expiration date, and I hadn't realized how much so until I was sitting across the table from a slightly country-sounding carpenter who I basically wanted to jump.
Spoon the mixture evenly into the tomatoes and sprinkle evenly with the Jack Cheese. Place the stuffed tomatoes in a microwave safe dish and microwave on high till the tomatoes soften but still hold their shape and the cheese melts, about 5 minutes. Let stand at room temp for about one minute before serving.
I do.
Will someone use this for their dissertation?
What I’m looking forward to: Being able to walk without getting a contraction.
food intake No. 1 (7am)
It seems like I don’t know anything about anything anymore. I’m so caught up in my own problems that they’re all I can see, think or feel.
Happy Thursday and thanks for taking the time to visit the charmed life blog. One of those laid back days for me. Well except for all the telemarketing calls I have been getting lately. I am on the do-not call list but I still get the non-profits and political calls.
Once we have all eaten our fill, and the boys are rolling in the wild mint to freshen up, I stroll down to sit with them and watch the sunset. Slowly, they each sit up, sniff the air, then coming to sit beside me.
"In some of the early tests ... it became clear we had opened up the opportunity for registering very misleading names," Vint Cerf, head of the Internet Corporation for Assigned Names and Numbers, reportedly said in a conference call wrapping up ICANN's meetings lasts week in Luxembourg. Nonetheless, these, these, these ,and other registrars continue to offer multilingual domain name registration services.
take over in a matter of weeks.
Maya Angelou (Rudolph) hosts her own Punk’d-style show in which she puts a pie on the chair of Morgan Freeman (Pharaoh), sets up Cornel West (Thompson) with a trick briefcase, and poses as a cop telling Stephen King (Hader) that his car just got towed. However, none of the pranks are anything more than whimsical, and none result in the victim’s anger or embarrassment – actually, they end with a significant level of mutual respect and proud, upstanding speech.
PS- sorry for the subject matter, but I do like to share! ;) Thank you for reading my little blog, nice posts and sad ones. I mentioned my disappointment in my last post, at not being able to sit down yet, and catch up here, and write those 'Dear Diary, I had a fab holiday' entries. But my weekend plans have changed, so I'm a little more likely to be able to catch up with my Bloggy World than I thought, give or take some paperwork. I'll be back soon, I hope, with happy tales from my Summer, plans for September, and maybe even a cake recipe too.
“What do you have
9. Networking: Android Leads in 4G
Courage does not mean one is not afraid or cannot fear. Courage is the ability to press forward and brave the outcome. Like jumping through a wall of fire to save your life, or the life of someone you love, courage is necessary. For this, Courage Under Flare™ is a fitting tribute to all RA patients who face this challenge.
After some time out of the media light, "Nyla" is now heard on Radio One talk/brokered WERE/1490 Cleveland Heights "NewsTalk 1490" Sunday evenings from 6-10 PM, on a program the station's schedule calls "Healing The Hurt Gospel With Miss Nyla And Daniel".
becauseeeeeeeee...
Huhu…another Korean Movie…^^…called Wonderful radio…starring my fav actress lee min jung…huhu, there are also kwang soo n his fellow running man…gary n kim jong kook…^^
...x
I become instantly aware of the harsh fluorescent lights of the store. The closeness of the isles surrounding me. I begin to feel too big for my own skin as I stand and step in front of my son. Blocking the woman’s stare. Facing her with all that I am. Shielding my son from her glare.
I have been blessed to be able to go and do the things I have. But you don't have to go to a foreign land to serve, or to give. There are so many opportunities here.
I know what you're thinking: How can a slasher series have any creativity or artistry to rape in the first place? Well, this movie is so bad and so odious in its stench that it manages to do so even when there was already a lack of those things. How low can you go? Well, this movie goes lower!
Workbox/File 7:Vocabulary Worksheet, 10 minutes
I love to talk to them all
Stay-in-jail strategies work best with larger numbers, but they do not require unanimity to work. We want to encourage people to do actions whether or not they can stay in jail afterwards. Solidarity is no longer effective movement building if the costs of an action become so high that only the extremely heroic or the chronically unemployed can do actions. When people feel judged or coerced into solidarity stands, they often react against the whole idea and may be reluctant to do future actions. When people feel supported in their choices, they will often make great personal sacrifices to support the group.
It took me some time to trust the ice. Despite all my youthful skating, I'm pretty sure this is the first time I've done it on a lake like this. There's a good 20 cm of solid ice out there, but it's a bit creepy to stare down through all the cracks and air bubbles frozen in place. Plus, it shifts and crackles sometimes as you move over it. Shudder. But once I got used to it, and my feet and legs started to remember how to move in skates, I had a grand old time.
It seems that everytime I go on a pub, or log onto r/tf2, I get waves and waves of ‘SPYCICLE OP! PHLOG OP! NERFNERFNERF’ Well, no. They aren’t.
Maraal burst out crying. “It's not a weapon, it's a toy.” She sobbed. “I want to go home”.
When we are able to properly address our mental or emotional issues, the energies flow freely and smoothly, and we are in an optimal and balanced state of well-being.
I was going to transcribe a Frank O'Hara poem for today's poetry slam,
You need a fire
Annual Plant Sale
If you click the pics you will be redirected to Hobbyhärvan's blog - however the postings are in Swedish... ;-)
Because by the end of the day I realised quite clearly
Then the King will say to those on his right, "Come, you who are blessed by my Father, inherit the Kingdom prepared for you from the creation of the world. For I was hungry, and you fed me. I was thirsty, and you gave me a drink. I was a stranger, and you invited me into your home. I was naked, and you gave me clothing. I was sick, and you cared for me. I was in prison, and you visited me."
Dude's gotta be punished, though. And I figure the consequence that angers him the most should probably be the one he receives, right?
The salad on the side, with shaved Parmesan and radishes, was lightly dressed with a heavenly, unctuous vinaigrette containing luxurious truffle oil. It didn’t overpower but was, rather, the perfect amount to make the salad a true bonus as opposed to a compulsory side.
Mika Pettersson, editor in chief of Finnish news agency STT, said the gunman opened fire at Prisma supermarket in the shopping center.
So, please, if you’d like, you can start with a hum. This is the melody, and this is the song for his soul…
“No, I think it’s made with Rice Krispies”
What we did:
You'll notice that the flap has been blurred. Normally I don't worry about what I post as far as my journals go, but this was REALLY personal, hence the blur.
You'll see your mother smiling at you
What do authors need to take into consideration when writing a sequel? It seems to depend somewhat on the intended audience.
Here is another shot and the wonderful inspiration photo.
But first, I want to talk about my friend Bruce. It's taken me a few days before I was ready to say anything, so sorry for the delay in posts.
Do you have a food memory that has always stuck with you?
:: I attached one row of doodle yarn to each mitten above the elastic casing
the body of Christ,
Ann of FrancescasFancy, winner of our April "Seed Beads Only" Challenge invites us to create a "Mystery" with her June 2012 theme!
Step 3: Now you should have a big loop for you to form your bows. Leave about at least 3-4 inches of your ponytail out for the middle of the bow. The ends of your ponytail will be used for the middle section of the bow.
The collie looked up from her slurping.
“But if I draw you the way you’re asking, you’ll end up looking like Jesus if he scrubbed toilets for a living. Is that what you want?”
Those sisterly words of advice!
Stuart Lindsey, Pharm.D. (USA)
2 distill
Finally, around the 3 hour 40 min mark he comes limping in, but slowly running. He did it! He made it even with his bad ankle. I was so proud of him! I couldn’t wait to tell him.
Sari- His willingness and ability to help with math
This latest snafu with the IC has many calling for an end to the institution. What’s the point of this committee if we clearly no longer have citizens with integrity. It seems every week there’s a new problem with a member of the integrity commission. From priests who plagiarise, to entire Commissions being found lacking and having to dismantle. If we don’t have the people to man the board….then dismantle the Pappy Show! http://newsday.co.tt/news/print,0,155132.html
I tell you this as someone who has watched the BP oil spill story unfold with the same fascination that a reticulated python has for a prey that is about to become dinner.
The man said: “You touched my heart. I came to that meeting out of curiosity. I really had no interest. I was on the verge of leaving the Church. But when it was announced that one of the Twelve Apostles would be there, I decided to go.
three people have passed away in the last few days that mean a lot to folks who mean much to me - although the deaths were not unexpected, their deaths will be devastating -
All in all, we're doing well and the fog of having a newborn is starting to lift (Thank you Lord:) Thank you for your patience during this season and I hope to start updating a little more frequently. As always, we covet your prayers!
If you're interested in using the same fern illustrations as me, for convenience I have included them below.
Began in 1976 and nestled in a peaceful, artistic community in the Catskill Mountains of New York, the High Falls Food Cooperative is among the best of the best in this category of small, quality co-ops maintaining incredible integrity. A staple in the community and surrounding towns with over 500 members, the High Falls Co-Op offers the very best quality organic grocery items, produce, local meats, homemade sauerkraut and a variety of tasty to-go items. The co-op’s board is committed to supporting local producers and sustainable products.
Stop and think about it. If you're an author, or a reader, think about all the books you own which you've never read. Think about all the books you've bought with the thought "I'll get to it."
Jason would like for the grooming, groping, manipulation and lies of his daughter, and the stress that his wife has been endured to receive restitution by way of a criminal conviction for grooming (which is in alignment with my petition and bill), and for him to spend time behind bars.
US hostage Weinstein sends a message to Obama in al Qaeda video
“I love you,” she was saying, rivulets of tears from her green eyes eroding her green make-up. “I love you, Tommy.”
I though dad was crazy. I enjoyed my sleep too much to attempt to emulate dad’s ways.
Perhaps not the best quality record 'vinyl-wise', but good enough to help me through these rough winter times and to get me in the right mental mood for spring...
What advice would you give to teens looking to leave high school?
Ayam Masak Chilli Merah (Red chillies chicken) is a Peranakan dish-originated from Malacca.
He doesn’t understand. I can’t talk like humans do and he doesn’t comprehend my language, which relies heavily on subtle visual signals. Oh well.
Of course, very few of the events depicted in the film are accurate at all, as my two previous articles on this movie's liberties with history have shown (see "Agora" and Hypatia - Hollywood Strikes Again and Hypatia and "Agora" Redux). There is no evidence of any library in the Serapeum and the idea that "Christian leaders" regarded philosophy and learning as "pagan and idolatrous" is simply nonsense. Prothero then assures us that "Hypatia is practically the only prominent female name among scholars in the ancient world", which is also wrong. Just a generation after Hypatia, for example, we have another famed female philosopher in Alexandria, Aedisia. Not only was she a famous scholar and teacher and a woman, but she was also a pagan. Yet somehow she managed to remain entirely unmolested by black-clad Christian mobs, which should give a bit of a hint that the portrayal of history in this film that Prothero finds so rock solid is actually not telling us the truth.
But of course things were the same as always. It starts in November on my birthday and pretty much lasts through January. This year I was extremely busy with other aspects of my life and had a harder time finding peace and quiet for myself. My job was crazy, my computer work was non-stop and my family was pulling me every which way possible.
He DID NOT spend four years in prison
This has generated news stories in almost every part of newsmaking – frontpage news; career sections, business and life. Everyone is talking about it and lawyers and consultants are saying this is just the tip of the iceberg.
4. Tequila Sunrise -- The Eagles
And, I can not tell you how happy I am with my new Sajou Petits Monstres, little monsters, after a year of having to rely on my ginormous kitchen shears and fingernail clippers to snip thread...
Today a report of 3 more deaths.
religions are not gods ... gods are not religions ...
I urge you to have a writing discipline. It does not have to be like mine.
27And Joshua said to all the people, See now, this stone is to be a witness against us; for all the words of the Lord have been said to us in its hearing: so it will be a witness against you if you are false to the Lord your God.
If you’re interested in a more sensible take on the subject, David Auburn’s play Proof has a very neat twist on the stereotype. Katherine, the protagonist, is the daughter of a famous mathematician beset by a mental illness in his later years (I don’t recall the illness being named in the play but it might be schizophrenia). She may have inherited his mathematical talent, his mental instability, or both; we get some answers in that regard by the end of the play. There’s a Broadway production of it posted on YouTube in its entirety: here’s Part 1 of the performance, and here’s Part 2. Part 3 is embedded above. There’s a scene near the end of the play where Katherine’s father, bursting with enthusiasm and joy, tells her that he’s been working again. It starts about the 14′ mark in the embedded segment and lasts about 8 minutes. You should see it if you haven’t already.
And that's exactly what 'Chardonnay' is offering.
A typical tort case (a tort is one party suing another to recover a defined damage) commences when the Plaintiff files a Complaint (a document that says who did what when and why it was bad). This Complaint is “served” on the Defendants within a certain time according to certain rules to ensure that proper notice is given. Basically, the service rules ensure that all parties are aware that a legal action is beginning.
When you open up all the compartments, this si what it looks like.
is the fountain of life,
When you’re saddled with a project, focused and on the verge of frustration, it could be very beneficial to step back and look at it from a different perspective—a solution-focused perspective.
This chic cosmetics pouch captures the adventurous spirit of Louis Vuitton’s classic travel gear. The elegant shape is flat on the bottom and curved on top for easy access to makeup and brushes. Nicely sized to fit into a handbag or tote.
"I'm hit!" cried Rivera as he was thrown back by a hit right in his chest armor. Mahan calmly aimed his carbine at the man closest to him, only 15 or so meters away, and sprayed two bullets into the man's chest and another right between the eyes. "Huah!" he shouted as he ducked back down to avoid the response. Rodriquez, in a frenzy, spewed all of his ammo into the bushes and then laid down behind the crest of the hill to reload. At least his fire made the guerillas duck their heads. McSherry managed to graze the left arm of one of the guerillas. The two remaining guerillas, including the injured one, grabbed their fallen comrade and fell back off the hill.
The sky looked dark for a moment. Thank goodness it did not rain. Best of all, a rainbow appeared. The camera snapped away.
Mu
I love zee ending of zee Chronicles of Narnia, the last paragraph of THE LAST BATTLE. "But for them it was only the beginning of the real story. All their life in this world and all their adventures in Narnia had only been the cover and the title page: now at last they were beginning Chapter One of the Great Story which no one on earth has read: which goes on forever: in which every chapter is better than the one before."
Tourist C: I think this is the site of the Temple of Bloopitus Bloppitus.
2. the assigning of priority order to projects on the basis of where funds and other resources can be best used, are most needed, or are most likely to achieve success
The Amazing Race (20x01) - Tears of a Clown
This card just took me a few minutes to make and you could send it out this year in lieu of Christmas cards. That’ll give you an extra week to get your cards out!!!
So why hasn’t the IOC banned Saudi Arabia?
Hopefully this guide has been helpful to you not only in giving you some ideas for a more entertaining suicide, but it also prepared you for that new and totally not boring at all world that you'll visit after you die. So I wish you good luck and have a nice li...death.
I wasn’t sure that she understood my question.
What has perhaps reached its ‘sell by date,’ and needs either to end, or have change within it, (usually when you are feeling consistently toxic or tired in a situation.)
5) Now we can use aloe, fresh from the plant or cream bought over the counter. We can also use Vitamin E cream or liquid from the capsule. This will sooth and prevent scaring.
Nope, didn't fall off the face of the earth. I am here. And well, very well! Why? Because I just returned from a fabulous vacation getaway! The hubster and I took a vacation out to Cali, which I am hoping is a future home state of mine.... IHeart it there, much more so than this cold and frigid climate I currently reside in.
And I just want to say, I almost did, too. It’s a pain to be a grown-up sometimes.
You know when I was in nursing school in the mid 1980’s, diseases like Alzheimer’s (AD), Lou Gehrig’s, MS and Parkinson’s were very rare. As time evolved their prevalence increased dramatically. In 1985 approx iamately 500,000 to 750,000 people were afflicted by Alzheimer’s although the differentiation with Dementia wasn’t really well defined. Currently the incidence of AD care costs over a trillion dollars. The only time you can literally diagnose AD is on autopsy. It was made known that there was damage to the neuron’s-nerve cells in the brain and the gaps between them, causing dark areas of “cellular garbage”, or senile plaques. That there were also “tangles” in the nerves of the brain.
But this is not because our media are sleepy. It is because the Metropolitan Police apparently tried to suppress an important story. So long as Mr Gorbuntsov did not die, and his would-be assassin was never apprehended and brought to justice, they would have had no obligation to come clean.
Now on the bone – under your eye,
Just for you?
or to have an adventure.
The doctor told us that there is no way to know exactly what surgery could/would be able to do for Olivia's functionality. She said that the best indicator of success would be to get her legs as straight as possible through botox injections, then get her up and walking to see what she could do. Because surgery would, simply put, be done to "get her legs straight," we could mimic that through botox. Of course, we've tried botox before and have seen her up and walking with her walker after a couple of weeks of intense stretching, and she's been able to take some steps. But as she gets older and heavier, she's moving slower and seems less interested...
The Continent, devoting the whole identity without reserving an atom,
Level 21: MP Cost: 50, Duration: 630 seconds, All Stats: +11%.
Glenn Hughes, Billy Duffy, Mike Inez, Duff McKeagan
So glad that you have joined us..Please don't be a stranger and post to the group so we can meet you!
Where beer does flow and men chunder
3. Fire colors are my favorite – red, pink and orange make me smile!
I'm not judging the hearts of Christian parents out there who allow this stuff in their kids' heads. I know parenting is tough and confusing. But I am evaluating and judging the music in the light of our Christian faith... and stating the obvious.
What is Playgirl doing right now?
"Hey big guy. Why don't you climb off the car, get in the back seat, and we'll have breakfast together. If you promise not to eat Melvin, I might even turn on the air-conditioning. Sorry about that global warming thing. Wait a minute. I almost forgot. Do you think you may be interested in buying some of my fantastic products and services?"
Badder than ol’ King Kong,
but still I'd choose
Goodbye.
NBC still has much rebuilding to do. They had a really rough year, even with the Super Bowl, but they can take solace in that they finally have a big entertainment competition show in The Voice and as a result they finally launched a drama that is averaging a 2.0 (Smash). Granted, much of that 2.0 is due to its placement after The Voice, but still that’s a victory for them. They also have a very decent Friday night player, Grimm, which is also returning.
But the real big news around our house is Bug-related. While we haven't been really focused on the issue, we have been talking about how exciting it is for big kids to use the potty rather than doing business in their diapers. Every now and again, Bug sits on the potty with no real success other than a slightly delayed nap time, which I'm sure she considers a victory.
I really would give this five stars, and even more if I could.
this here is a doosy !
Since I've started working in a shared studio, I'm sketching a lot more ideas out and writing again too.
You ignore the “Staffie guards this house” sign as you gingerly make your way towards the front door. First you hear the barking, then the run up the hallway, the huge thud as the dog hits the door with force followed by the leaflet disappearing straight into the dog’s mouth as you reel back from another near miss. Yes still 10 fingers.
As I have been saying for quite some time, you can’t move in Scotland at the moment without a new microbrewery popping up while you’re looking the other way.
To say I'm excited about going to Venice is like saying a kid is excited on Christmas Eve. It's Just. Not. Possible. For me. To Be. More. Excited.
(My dad/Papa Bryan hitting the slopes with his grandkids) So...can you see that the kidlets have become snowboarders??? They love it. I used to ski, but I do not have the time, or the money, to start back up this year. May and graduation are just around the corner though, right????? Oh and guess what??? We got a new puppy after Thanksgiving. He is a miniature Schnauzer ( I have always wanted one!!!!) and his name is Tucker. I have lots of pics of him, but they are on my other computer (I got a laptop too!!!). (Miss Katie flying by me....)
Today I was spoiled rotten. We walked around the river walk at the Forks, bought some new yard furniture, and relaxed in the yard. I even finished the book I was reading and can now move on to more blog reading. I now have the evening to myself as the boys went to the Van Halen concert so now I am honouring my Mom's memory by sipping a rum based bevvie in the yard! This one is another ginger syrup concoction!
I felt a bit as though I had taken her name in vain, but it seems she still has a tremendous sense of humour.
“I’m doing this for you, so you can be comfortable.”
Allen West Confronted by Koran-Wielding CAIR Executive
I created the numbers on my computer (using Copperplate font), then printed them out on label paper. Fold each piece of scrapbook paper in half diagonally, then in half again. Use the fold lines to cut 4 equal triangles.
- Chairs were from Garden Ridge, buy one get one half off – about $100.
I’m nervous about it and I haven’t even planted it yet. Because remember when I planted the crap ton of seeds and was all nonchalantly like “no biggie. I’m sure less than half will even germinate. Let’s plant extras (!) so that when they inevitably don’t all germinate, I’ll at least have enough to get my vegeatable loving self through the summer and fall months.”?
And if you do visit their blog, tell Gloria and Ben I said hi and thanks for the nice lunch and that I'll never forget them for being such friendly, nice people. (Who were initially strangers and the became more)
as far as the eye can see
Fact is we need more qualified people in certain fields, but those fields aren’t likely to see more students just because more people are going to school to for free. Just because we need more engineers and IT professionals doesn’t mean we can get them with a snap of the fingers. Kids that weren’t taught math in primary school aren’t just going to turn into engineers. Rather than more graduates what the United States needs is more apprenticeship style education and certification programs. Make it easier for more people to prepare directly for specific work and then make it easier for them to get jobs by getting the government out of the hair of businesses.
Event Start Date: now
Truly Nolen has a number of antique cars parked around town. I've been taking pictures of as many as I can find. It's been a treasure hunt!
The best is truly ahead, for You have many promises in Your Word concerning ___________. Show me each and every day how You would have me pray to see all Your promises come to pass. In Jesus’ name, Amen.”
Another bad iphone photo, but I really liked my outfit, so I had to do it. I took some close ups once I got to the office (w/my iphone) so you could see the actual colors and details of my outfit. In my outfit picture, my belt is a little higher than my actual waist but I didn't have time to fix that before snapping the pic...I'm out the door and on my way to work w/my iced chai in hand! Have a great day!
They pictures were all photographed at the botanical garden of the university of Leipzig. One of my favorite places in this town. :) For the date: 23. July 2010. I just needed time for sorting them etc. This is only a small part of the collection. I tried to make a collection of the (for me) most interesting ones. I also made a lot pictures of other ones but a lot more "common".
Unless a person sees his need of the Saviour, he will not heed the message of salvation. Unless a person is sick he will not go to the doctor. Saul met the Lord Whom he had been persecuting and immediately came under conviction. In Acts 9:6 we read of his immediate response.
* What kind of working relationship do you aim to build between you and your clients? Do you see yourself as a career builder or prefer a more manuscript by manuscript approach?
But on we go, tomorrow is another day, and in spite of it all I am looking forward to seeing what happens next. It a tough go but nothing has defeated me yet so this won’t either. Their is only one man in my whole crazy life, that was able to bring me to my knees! And that was God’s Son.! For him I will forever stand.
Instead Mum and I climbed higher onto the moors...still driving . It seemed like cheating to be able to view all this without breaking into a sweat but as Mum is not that mobile these days it was a blessing she could still enjoy it ...
It's crazy to think that Eric Clapton, Jeff Beck and Jimmy Page were all once members of the same band, The Yardbirds. Not at the same time, of course!
I gasped. “Kirsten! Pretend to talk to me so I can still stare, but they won’t know since I’m supposedly talking to you.”
The new chicks:
Still in doubt would be Missouri (10), Virginia (13), North Carolina (15), and Ohio (18). If Obama wins even one of these states, game over. Even if Romney were able to pick off Maine or New Mexico from Obama, he still cannot win if he loses Virginia, North Carolina or Ohio. Indeed even if Romney picks up both New Mexico AND Maine, and Missouri, Virginia and North Carolina, he still loses if he loses Ohio. This is a tough road to hoe.
Sometimes I wish I could go back in time and re-do most of my life. Mainly because I have done lots of stupid things over the years but also to take more notice of the people around me and be a friend to those who I have forgotten.
Our youth need us to believe in them. They have the potential to be the next Dolores Huerta, Cesar Chavez, or even the next President Barack Obama. Join the Children in the Fields Campaign in supporting these amazing youth and find programs in your area that support farmworker children. Together, we can make a difference in the lives of these vulnerable children.
In April 1987, a friend took this photo of him and The Boss after the Tunnel of Love show at the LA Sports Arena.
because one time he gave me
The other iffy thing about starting a story this way is the fact that the story itself really doesn't make an appearance - just the backstory. We don't meet any of the main characters, and though we can guess that the conflict probably has something to do with zombies, we don't know how the protagonist will factor into that conflict.
But no, I am at loss of words, my mind preoccupied with my forthcoming Deutsch Certification exam that is driving me to my wits' end! Okies, it is not rocket-science; but I always get this familiar queasy feel in my abdomen whenever there is an exam, big or small, awaiting me! ;)
24-set break and radio banters 2.04
There are 10 different waterfall hikes featured on the site, and some of the hikes will take you past several waterfalls on one journey. If you haven't experienced some of these walks, start adding them to your "bucket list."
John and Dianna Dariano, parents of Matt Dariano, Kurt and Julie Ann Fagerstrom, parents of Dominic Maciel, and Kendall and Joy Jones on behalf of Daniel Galli were named as the plaintiffs in the lawsuit. They are represented by the Becker Law Firm in Los Angeles and the Thomas More Law Center in Ann Arbor, Mich. Becker and the Thomas More Law Center are also litigating a similar case of discrimination on behalf of a Merced sixth-grade girl who was ordered by school officials to remover her pro-life T-shirt.
Hey Guys! I have a few polishes to get rid of! Some are extras I picked up for people who ended up not wanting them, and the others are from a dusty find.
Why I Love Second-Hand Watches
Our Father which art in heaven...
No doubt, he was a titan of timing in the 22 years (1981-2003) he was PM. He paced his purposes – those he elected for himself and those imposed by circumstance – to events he carefully choreographed or that broke out on his watch which his proactive stance enabled him to get quickly on top of.
THEY WERE SELLING ME JANE COATS FOR £20.
The ground is moving under us. Mind the gap.
So clear, as in no face with more delight.
I'm working from home for the day. As you might have noticed in the picture above, my little pup has a hurt paw so I'm home taking care of him today. He was playing with another dog last night during the game and got a toe nail stuck in the carpet and ripped it out. It was the little guy's first injury. I may or may not have teared up slightly.
8/1 -- While the media has finally reported lately a little on the uncertainty that Japanese residents near the exclusion zone have felt, that isn't news exactly. The worthwhile information lately is only that locals have finally taken cleanup into their own hands in a notable way -- replacing the topsoil on school playgrounds, one of the most obvious and needed mitigations.
Located in the historic Taft Building, which is steeped in Hollywood history dating back to the 20's - and housed offices of Hollywood icons from Charlie Chaplin to Academy of Motion Picture Arts and Sciences to The Hollywood Reporter - Wood and Vine has a unique decor and indoor/outdoor/bar/lounge/upstairs/downstairs space that makes you feel as if you've stepped into another time and place. Notice I didn't say movie set - it doesn't give off that forced, false, touristy vibe in a theme park, Planet Hollywood kind of way - but in a way that feels authentic and transportative, and makes you forget that you're just a short but treacherous walk away from the kitsch of "superheroes", "aliens", "stormtroopers" and shops blasting sound and fury, peddling plastic "best mother/father/brother/sister of the year" academy award statuettes.
Louboutin told Reuters that the PPR Group were being extremely unfair in the court battle over red soled shoes.
First, let me remind you that the winner gets THREE coloring books, ONE crayon roll, ONE box of color pencils, and THREE original drawings by ME (Jim)!!!! You're probably saying to yourself what a lucky person this must be, right? I KNOW! Huh!?
Hope to get some time to figure out my laptop issue so I can have the chance to catch up with everyone!
JR: In what way has it been the ‘best 4 years of your life’?
“What do you mean?” said the blonde, in a beautiful foreign accent.
Constables Sibusiso Zwane, Simo Mazikwane, Liveni Mbuwako, and Siboniso Mbhele were based at the Samora Machel informal settlement, spokesperson Moses Dlamini said.
We have a winnah on the OCL Blog Hop this past weekend! Congratulations to Courtney Johnston who commented "I could definitely use one of those! I LOVE your card! Thanks so much for sharing!"
“Well, I didn’t use a condom last night. You could be pregnant right now,” was his reply.
December 2, 2011 ~ Got the call saying they received our contract and we will be assigned to someone. Also got an email from the homestudy department with our application from Ohio Dept. of Job and Family Services for Child Placement. We will be e mailing that back on Monday morning.
235900 Other special trade contractors
There is a war currently against those who have money, therefore giving the impression that money is somehow this evil entity and even the very expression of the belief of money has been misquoted in various scriptures.
Standing out from the crowd is going to be an uphill battle, though—I can tell. I mean, I’m not even the first Tara to write on this blog. (Hi, Tara Lazar!) It seems that I’ll have my work cut out for me.
Gargano shrugged it off. “Number one, I don’t know if it’s 6% to 3%,” he said, attributing the nearly one-third decline in revenues to an 8% cut in the project size that disproportionately affected office space, which, if filled, offers more of a fiscal bang for buck.
"We need to go." Abby's voice wobbled. She should be pushing him away. Not just because she had a job to do, but because this could never be anything other than a fling. She was one of the Fearless. Her duty came first and it would claim her life sooner than later. He was one of the fae. His world wasn't hers. He would leave after his blood debt was paid. And she didn't do flings. Already she felt too much for him.
It has been 54 days since he left. We are 19% through with this deployment. I'm sorry that just seems so low but hey got to start somewhere right?
Please pass this message on to your friends and colleagues.
"Only in the present moment can we touch life and be deeply alive."
I took out all of my old January issues of my favorite magazines from the couch table and have them in a neat stack, ready to be leafed through like they are every year. Am I the only one whose favorite issues are the January ones? They are always so full of clean freshness...humble designs and hearty, simple meals. Somewhat of a relief from the gaudy Christmas issues, where you feel this pressure for decorating and cooking to be especially spectacular.
I'm writing a series for younger readers and a YA novel. Who knows what will happen? Certainly not me, and I'm not going to make any predictions about my own 2011 future for fear of jinxes! But what I can tell you is that I will be writing my socks off, being super-critical of and ruthless about my own work before it goes anywhere and keeping my fingers and toes crossed that I'll beat my own gloomy forecast (see above). This blog will shortly be getting a major redesign, so look out for that, as well as the forthcoming reviews for the 2011 British Books Challenge. I'll carry on with my mad tweeting and hope to reach 1000 Twitter followers before the end of February. I will also be one of those authors on YouTube--watch this space for news. And my final prediction is that I'll be grateful, as always, for the support I receive throughout the year from all of you, and from my lovely bookish and authory friends around the world. I couldn't do it without you, so thanks in advance!
When serving with idli, mix generous amount of sesame oil or ghee and serve.
How delightful it was to have these visitors, and how sad to see them leave again so soon.
"Charlie Kenny's mother is having a baby. And instead of getting the kid a normal present, like a teddy bear or a rattle, Charlie gets himself into a bet. To knit something for the baby.
The climax of the episode was really well done. The action moves pretty quickly from one revelation to another, from one reaction to another, and all that shit that went down in the first place is on pace to being resolved. However, there are a few loose threads that were introduced when the new details were added that I can’t really explain without pulling something out of my ass, so I’ll leave it to future episodes to explain it for me.
That’s not to say all homosexuals will obtain an STD, but they may never have a family. They may never actually find someone to love for the rest of their life, they may never be truly happy. Which can be said the same of, of all different kinds of people. Of everyone.
Then it seemed to make sense to give Hester a scar, which she's received at the hands of the villain, so there's her initial motivation - revenge - right there on her face; she's like Captain Ahab with his missing leg! But I didn't want it to be a little cosmetic scar - the Hollywood way of dealing with facial disfigurement is always to have somebody who's a bit messed up seen from one angle but is still gorgeous from most others. So Hester's scar is really grotesque; I didn't want her to be pretty from any angle!
I had no idea what to do with it when it was finished. It ended up being used in my kitchen pantry to hold small packaged items such as ranch dressing, onion soup, etc. It found a happy home at last.
I prefer to do this way because if not, I find the Korean
One-third of all U.S. troop deaths in Afghanistan this year have been at the hands of Afghan troops. On top of all that, Pakistan has blocked military supply trucks from entering Afghanistan.
The research team, led by Professor Jill Pell...
I’m sure our lawyer had never quite had clients like Rob and I before, but he was a rock I could count on, and he never let me down. He told me there’d be some paperwork to deal with corporate changes that had to now be filed but that it could wait a bit.
Nietzsche considers it inevitable that the phenomenon he is detailing will pass right by contemporary generations without notice, because a person does not take note of an event until after it has passed. Or, more poetically, “the light of the remotest stars comes last to men; and until it arrives man denies that there are stars there.”[16] Nietzsche asks once again what it is that noble means to us today, “what allows one to recognize the noble human being, under overcast sky of the beginning rule of the plebs that makes everything opaque and leaden?”[17] The philosopher makes it clear that despite his previous emphasis on how the noble man acts and works, they are not the fundamental principle that sets the noble apart from the herd; these qualities are merely the end-products of the greater sum. What separates the noble man from his common counterpart is his faith: “it is the faith that is decisive here, that determines the order of rank.” Whereas the faith of the lower slave moralist leads him to always appeal to the authority of an external higher, an imagined, wish-granting phantom beyond the clouds, the noble man grounds his faith in the only consciousness that is accessible to him—his own: “The noble souls has reverence for itself.”[18]
As far as I’m concerned this is easily Mellencamp’s best song. A tune about small,
He said ”Want to get out of here?”
3) Abu Ghraib
Giving me a hot wet brew.
Whom I love the most,
Saturday, 5/19: I can’t help it. I’ll have to cook fish again. Once the market season is on and that fisherman is there peddling his wares, I’m powerless to resist.
Therefore, He had to be made like His brethren in all things, that He might become a merciful and faithful high priest in the things pertaining to God, to make atonement for the sins of the people. Hebrews 2:17
There is also the nature of cause & effect. Without the brutality of the Boer civilian deaths in the concentration camps: there would have been little fuel for the later rise of Afrikaner Nationalism which was mainly used by the Cape based Afrikaners -who were not numerically affected by the camp deaths as the Boers were as they were not interned & were often on the side of the British- to first co-opt the Boers in order to prevent Boer secession (as was attempted by notable Boer Generals in 1914) & then to propagate Afrikaner hegemony over the new British created artificial macro State which lumped numerous nations & tribes under a single administration for the first time ever in the region.
What was the basic premise of the show?
It might be somewhat brutal for me to admit it, but I loved that feeling. I loved the loathing that suddenly filled my heart, it made me feel like I had nothing left to lose, because I had already lost everything, it filled me with such hateful motivation that I no longer felt weak, it gave me control. I seized that control and that loathing and on that day I made a vow, that I would never, ever, allow myself to be that vulnerable again and that I would never, ever, let someone break me. Never Ever.
She narrates about how she wanted to break up like one of those cool women in foreign films. She didn’t want to cry over the news of his impending marriage but instead wanted to attend his wedding in order to cheer on the couple. And then that night, she wanted to happily meet a great new boyfriend at a café terrace somewhere. I know that it sounds completely absurd but Mi Roo’s emotional state doesn’t allow her to play it cool or be practical. Safe in the privacy of her home, she can be as vulnerable and ridiculous as she wants to be.
Flora Blue & White varigated
and hear the crossing buzzer ring
I just didn’t know
And, continual resupply: this means the molten hooey down there contains lots of N and about a fifth that much O, or what?Well, sort of. The nitrogen that's emitted is largely in the form of various nitrous oxide compounds...but eventually gets to N2 in one way or another, as that's a really low energy state for N to occupy. Oxygen, on the other hand, also gets emitted via a much larger supply of CO2, (as well as SO2) but there's a lot of extra sinks for the oxygen to go to, such as carbonates, silicate rocks, iron oxide, and such. O2 only gets into that form through plants, and is actually quite a high-energy state...left to its own devices with no photosynthesis, O2 would pretty quickly disappear from the atmosphere.
Not really a heading that has anything to do with anything but it jumped into my head so there it goes.
Like fudge, they're one of the items I hesitate to make and keep at home. As my coworkers witnessed with a box of donuts last week, when my willpower breaks, it isn't pretty. But the other day I was being set up on a blind date, and figured if it really sucked, at very least I could come home to a tray of my beloved oat fudge bars.
Poplars are covered in new shiny brown leaves that will soon turn green. Mighty oaks, chestnuts, and beeches are showing off their tiny first leaves as green down.
Maternity clothes: No updates here – I’m still wearing them. I haven’t really bought anything else as I feel like I have enough staples to get me through for now. The baby hasn’t moved up very much, so my bump is still in the same spot – maybe a bit higher some days than others. It’s starting to round out more and look less fat-like, so I’m glad about that. Next week I promise to have an updated belly shot picture. I want to do something cool like my friend Liz over at Bon Temps Beignet. She has showcased her beautiful bump in a very artistic way. Isn’t she adorable?!
m) A tear jerker is on. How do you react if alone? How do you react if with others?
The excitement Luis had felt now infused Pete, and he recognized an opportunity. With Prof. Sinclair gone for at least another two weeks, Pete would have time to examine the interior on his own. If he moved quickly, he might be able to submit the initial findings under his own name, rather than as "second author" status under Sinclair. This find, Pete realized, could mean the difference between getting his first job at Podunk College for the Semi-Literate, or getting his first job at Ivy-Covered Research University. He would have to cut corners, he would have to move fast, and he would have to document his findings in some public way.
Still, the doctors won't rule out Lupus, because Drug-Induced Lupus does not cause the facial rash like regular Lupus, and I have the facial rash and the photosensitivity. I did read on the Internet forums that some people have developed other auto-immune diseases while taking Singulair, and other people who already had Lupus and other auto-immune diseases had to stop taking Singulair, because Singulair caused flare-ups and made them worse. So it is possible that I am susceptible to Lupus, as I had been tested before when I was 10 or 11, and the Singulair may have triggered it or at least triggered an episode. Come to think of it, when I had problems and they tested me for Lupus before, they were also guinea-pigging me on new asthma/allergy meds. The problem is, Singulair works wonders for my allergies, and when I'm off it, all the other problems go away, but I'm incapacitated by constant sneezing, wheezing, runny nose, runny eyes, and all that shite.
JS: For me, it’s all in the spelling.
The third school I visited was Rangikura School in Porirua just a few miles away from Wellington.
Opening Party 7.00pm to 12pm, Tuesday 1st May 2012 Exhibition 1 – 5 May 2012
3 good-sized boneless chicken breasts, cut each in two
Slave of (blood) lust
Here is the Raspberry Dark Chocolate unwrapped. It is small - just two squares. But there is a ton of nutrition and great taste packed into those 2 tiny squares.
I’m not sure exactly when I’ll find out where I’ll be working. I have to pay a housing deposit. Possibly then… or maybe when I move in to the apartment. I’ve heard conflicting reports. I do know that i’m not in the Magic Kingdom (THANK GOODNESS!). You get paid more if you’re there (though I’m sure you certainly earn it) and my pay offer was standard. That rules out my fear of being placed at the Pinocchio Village House. I’ll keep you posted as I know more.
I tried my best to never let you in to see the truth
As the weekend approaches you might expect me to be all excited about the weekends cooking lager plans but the lady squeeze has but the kybosh on my desire to get pissed up and attempt to rattle her. Off to a do and muggings here is driving. Bummer really. You cannot misbehave if you don’t drink. When you drink you can and blame it on the grog during the following day’s apologies. I was looking at Tandy’s beer magazine and planning a trip out to Rochdale’s Spoons to name that February’s pub of the month but that will have to wait. The squeeze doesn’t understand the importance of cooking lager campaigning, nor the right of every free Englishman to buy cheap lout. That’s women for you Still if I behave myself like the good boy I am I expect I will get my reward.
In regards to the Sacrament of the Sick, the Church does not teach that it is a guaranteed remedy for bodily illness. While it may be God’s will to heal bodily illness through the sacrament on some occasions, it is also a sacrament that heals our spiritual sickness and prepares us for death. It is clearly illustrated in scripture.
Judges have superior knowledge of dog breed standards down to the finest details. One can become a judge only after many years of experience in dog shows and breeding.
Volodya is a nickname for Vladimir and Medvedi, or bears, sounds similar to the last name Medvedev.
Back in the Bad Old Days They Had Two Words for This - "Ni**er Rich!!!!" Oh Em I Gonna Catch Hell for This One
For many years, I said DO NOT SELF-PUBLISH.
We kept walking in love,
Daniel Rops
Late one evening in the midst of an unusually cool summer, just after Mother had extinguished the last candle within the iron wreath, there was a knocking at our door. Not a knocking as if made by a hand, but rather a thumping as if it were made by something much larger. Startled by the sound, my sister ran to Father. Curious and a bit angered at the hour, Father placed Madeline in her bed and went to the door. I was already huddled with Mother near the foot of the steps which lead down to the root cellar. I was helping her to gather vegetables for the following day’s stew. Mother put her arms around me. I peeked up and around to see the cause of the late night commotion.
Prepare healthier alternatives, ensure meals are prepared in advance, try to incorporate more vegetables into each meal
Our focus verse for the Say It With Scripture Challenge at the Sweet 'n Sassy Connection is 2 Corinthians 5:17, "Therefore if any man be in Christ, he is a new creature: old things are passed away: behold, all things are become new." Last week we talked about how our music should change once we've accepted Christ as Saviour. This verse tells us that the changes should not stop with just our music. Old things are to pass away and ALL things are become new. This means those old attitudes, actions, vocabulary and ways of thinking need to change. Depending on the person, it may require a change of wardrobe, viewing habits and how we interact with others. WHY do we need to change? Because we are a NEW creature in Christ. We are not the same as we used to be and we now wear the name of Christ. People should be able to see a difference in our lives; we should not look, act, sound or react like an unbeliever. This week, let's each take a look an inward look and ask the Lord to show us areas where we're allowing the world to creep back into our lives. Then, let's ask the Lord to help us make the changes necessary to make sure "old things are passed away."
Around this time last year I participated in a tea cup exchange with my blogging friend Comeca. We both agreed that we loved the idea and thought it would be fun to do something similar again this year. So Comeca and I along with a host of other bloggers participated in a favorite things gift exchange. The rules were simple, invite a blogger you are familiar with to participate and exchange a few of your favorite things without spending more than $20. The gift exchange was a lot of fun! A huge thank-you to Vicky, Comeca, Michelle, Elesha, Latoya, Ange, Lisa, Tiffany, Anna, Katrina, Summer, Pam and Dee! This exchange would not have been possible without your participation!
Along with getting accepted to graduate school Lucy has also met a guy in England who she is quite fond of. From the tiny bit that she has told me I would say she is in love, but if you knew Lucy you would know that me saying that would make her mad. Until this guy Lucy didn’t even know she was capable of being a sappy love-sick girl. They do adorable things like fall asleep together on Skype. It’s quite romantic if you ask me, but what do I know?
In the true spirit of mocking things vintage, I've decided to feature some crazy vintage ads over the next couple of days...
"What do you mean three burritos? Are you crazy?"
Classic line: Page 107:
Since the Claremont Artwalk last month, we did our Easter Outreach with Onelite. It was amazing. We had booths, food, haircuts, the Easter bunny, rap artists, new shoes, bouncers and Easter baskets. This is an annual event done for the community, and it was such a blessing
It is of course a brilliant conceit that this is a silent movie dramatising the demise of the silent era. And the fact that it has captivated audiences the world over adds a beautiful irony to the whole endeavour. But perhaps its most enchanting quality is that it tells a complex story in its most simplistic form — thus recreating the innocence of an era when audiences didn't need loads of hi-tech bells and whistles to appreciate the magic of cinematic story-telling. How cool is that, to be able to enjoy a movie as if you've never seen one before?
I am not working, I am not doing anything, I am not really living. But I am breathing.
Why this facelift works:
Regardless of my complaints, here I am studying up on Systems Center, which seems like a heck of a lot of bloated software (my test environment has 8 servers, with 7 different pieces of software running) to do some very cool stuff. But who wants to go back to being an MCSA??
So long in the cocoon..and now she was free..free to fly..fly away.because they had been called to the world and she had been called …to herself.
The sofa's end tables were used to store magazines which had been on the coffee table but were now no longer current. After a while these dated issues were taken to the doctor’s office, I suppose in trade for well worn National Geographic's.
all your fave retailers like
it was actually one of the happiest nights of my life
I started by stamping the script background in bermuda, added evergreen leaves and orange marigolds. A couple of die cut butterflies and onyx pearls complete the picture.
I have this lovely little tree out front. I don't know what it's called, but it has the most amazing pink blossoms you ever did see. The pink just cheers me up whenever it's in bloom.
If you are cooking alone, you can even turn the heat completely off while you’re making the chops and then reheat it briefly before plating. If you have a cooking partner, he or she can start the chops while you’re working on the beans. Beans are easy-going. They are not high-maintenance about waiting. You can relax!
Because of their outright incompetence, the Roundsmen and Watchmen were fast becoming an endangered species. It was the 1841 murder of Mary Rogers, that put the final nail in their coffin. With plenty of clues as to who the murderer was, the Roundsmen dragged their heels long enough that Roger’s killer was never found.
Green Flash Brewing Co. Green Flash Pallet Wrecker
to a rich sonorous slumber
I wish I could have just sat back and relaxed and accepted Meteor as the product of a bygone era and soaked in the crummy special effects and the bombastic (and Oscar-nominated) music score. But no: this is not a movie that one can easily enjoy in spite of itself. It's kind of annoying, actually, when you think that they had all of this potentially-enjoyable subject matter but then pulled an "okay, here it is" on us and presented it as-is. And as-is doesn't work for Disasterploitation.
Well, I did mention that I had two new stamps up in the store, and it just would not be right if I did not give you a little look see here!
95) I just had to come talk with you. Sweetness is my weakness.
I really wanted a colorful map for the wall and found this one at a local store for $17. The kids love having a map and they often use it when playing American Girls. They will pick a state or city that they are going to travel to and then talk about staying overnight in a place along the way. So fun and a great way for them to learn some geography too!
Wilder would go on to play a pivotal role in Depeche Mode's development, crafting and arranging Martin Gore's songs to create something more substantial than the slightly shiny, brittle, metronomic synthpop which had characterised the band's sound beforehand (some of the more experimental moments on "A Broken Frame" aside). Many fans believe that the bolder, almost symphonic sweeps found on albums like "Black Celebration" and "Music for the Masses" owe a great deal to him. If, however, he had any similar ambitions in The Hitmen, it's not obvious from their output. Of their previous single "Ouija", a music critic was (somewhat prophetically) moved to comment: "The winning thing about the Depeche Mode single (and their last, and Soft Cell's) is its simple enthusiasm, its complete lack of cynicism. The Hitmen are so calculating - even down to the clever, clever name - it's unbearable; the only remotely comforting thing about all this is that they haven't a dog's chance of ever getting a hit." Slightly harsh, perhaps, but still not terribly far off the mark. The follow-up "I Still Remember It" would, despite its hopeful title, fail to grab the attention of many. It's unobjectionable and sounds passable, but there's a clear lack of identity apparent and nothing to set the band apart from the numerous other pub rock bands gigging at the time. It's refreshing and punchy, but is a bit too simplistic and clean to leave a lasting impression or create a desire to hit the "play" button one more time.
In a statement on the Rovio website, the company said: “Angry Birds Space hit 50 million downloads within 35 days, making it the fastest growing mobile game yet and breaking all our previous records. This has been simply amazing, and the whole Rovio team is thrilled to see such a fantastic reception for the game.
Have a Crafty Day
And so, back to realities of daily life here in the Midwest, where there are no warm chaussons de pommes and café crème waiting for me around the corner at breakfast time. But it’s nice to know that they’re out there somewhere.
these are my choices and I know you can see why - there is subtle beauty - charming creativity, details abound and everlasting cuteness! Thanks ladies so much for your efforts - you all did so great and it was so difficult to pick just a few! Rock on Crafters!!
Dedicated to Michelle, from the whole of My Being…
Her tongue licking my shaft
Do astral sentient beings stare
We hope this helps with your internet marketing efforts now and in the future.
They don’t know it yet, but they inspired me to make some hand-crafted mother’s day cards today! Thank you Laurel and Nancy!
Liz Wirth: What do you care? What do you care about Black Rock?
Firstly, with both French contractors already awarded the contract for the sarcophagus, the additional EU money has a strikingly similar feel to a lot of US Aid. By that I mean the money is given to a nation and then channeled back to US companies. EU money boosting the French economy is good for the EU regardless of the benefits to Ukraine.
To not stay separate across the grey-blue foaming sea.
flakes of life
Bored yet? Me too. Does that mean there’s too much detail? No. It means there’s too much extraneous detail.
Cool Pink Pigment (MAC)
Until a few minutes ago I thought the "instant wrap" gift bag was my signature wrapping style.
Europe, the majority of whose nation-states are nominal democracies, has proved utterly unable to shake off its masters, despite the well-established opposition of the majority of ordinary Europeans to them and their socialist-superstate scheme. The Old World has had longer to marinate in socialist and superstate ideas, though one might well wonder why the proximity of the largest failed socialist superstate in history hasn't dampened their affection for them. What those ordinary Europeans fail to grasp is that their demands on their governments, jointly and severally, constitute a demand for exactly what's being done to them. The ideological habitat of contemporary Europe is immensely favorable to authoritarianism, socialism, and the Omnipotent State, and ferociously hostile to freedom, capitalism, and national sovereignty.
Do collectors love this Norwegian artist when he's not screaming? Weeks after Lehman Brothers floundered in 2008, Munch's "Vampire" sold at Sotheby's in New York for $38.1 million. The work, depicting a red-haired woman hovering over a man in a black suit, was considered a masterpiece. It was also replete with the artist's dark and twisted signature imagery.
living room that would eat us up, or that monsters lived under the
The Hunger Games is the latest novel to film phenomenon that has hit cinemas in the last few weeks that has been gathering enough pace to be dubbed the new “Twilight”. However after two viewings of The Hunger Games it deserves far more attention and respect as it’s substance is far more superior to that of Twilight.
"Shelter Pale Ale will always be one of my favorite beers, because I was drinking that waiting to propose to my wife," Jeremy says. "I want to make good beer, but I also want people to enjoy that beer and what they're doing. That's what you're trying to portray. You don't want people to just slam it back and get hammered. It's about enjoying your beer."
Torbreck, youth and knowledge, confidence, fucking bee's dick from arrogance, thinks (thinks? at this point in time?) E@L. E@L is one fat drunk dude, again. Discussion ensues about best pizza in the world. Brac, says E@L the four cheese in the Trattoria there.
The head monk said, “That doesn’t surprise me. All you’ve done is complain since you got here.”
That's intensive quilting. And I just started on Sunday, really. So I've been busy.
A few years ago, I was talking with my mom about the very popular self-help book “Who Moved My Cheese?” about dealing with change at work and in life. The book argues you must have a positive attitude about change and adapt in order to survive.
Also pick your photo. I’m using a standard 15x10 cm (6x4) photo of a Christmas tree. If you’re working on a bigger sized layout (say 12x12) then a larger photo would also work great.
COMEDY: A-
2) Are Idaho certified teachers; and
First class: International Cuisine
Instead of responding to this overture, Perpetua, STL mother WALKED OUT of the meeting to convene an impromptu caucus outside the kindergarten room where we were meeting. STL and Charles Mwangi excused themselves, claiming that they had to pick up someone at the airport. When members of the committee including this writer, protested that they could not just utter serious allegations casting aspersions on the integrity of individuals in the room and leave without waiting for an amicable resolution, they simply walked out.
Today is my day off. I actually have an early day off since this coming Sunday is inventory Sunday at work. After today, I will have to work the next 6 days in a row before I am off again. I will be glad to get thru this week.
I'd begged the fantastic bloggers (and women!!!) Danielle, Amy, and Florinda to take me to the Los Angeles Times Festival of Books—a running joke we had among us. But I didn't really expect them to, you know, take me there. I'm agile, perhaps, and I can still bend, but I don't fit into any suitcase. Still, being the inventive and loving women they are, they found a way, and here's the photograph to prove it. That's one bright happy moment, the three of them with this part of me. It put a tear in my eye when I saw it late last night.
In 2006 he found his graceful stride straight away, helping to reinvigorate the team as we turned the season around in the final months. Then came his career nadir, and Dan Smith’s greatest achievement. A long recovery followed, and during this time the optimism about him started to fade.
Today we leave for another wedding in Sedona. Then back to work Tuesday all the way until the next weeding in two weeks!
Why? I wanted to tell him that he had to go because neither his father or I had the opportunity to go, because our childhoods, compared to our peers, were miserable and that both of us were going to work our asses off and go broke just to ensure that our son would have everything we never did. Everything and more. But why?
She looks very sexy with her sexy and flirtatious poses and is flirting with the viewer like C.C. does. I really like her make up, it is very exotic like C.C.'s eyes and her wig is flawless and looks like her real hair. She really does look like the real C.C. and has the facial expressions hands down. These photos are very exotic and you get a real cheeky. C.C. vibe of them. I might do my eye make up like the cosplayer's for Eirtakon. She is defiantly my favourite C.C cosplayer so far. :p When I saw these photos I wanted to find out who the cosplayer and photographer were and you can find the photographer's website here. The cosplayer doesn't have a DA or website, she could of been just a model for the photographer's portfolio but still so well done! I know alot of guys would appreciate these photos. ;)
When we take a look at what went on in our childhood, how we felt in relationship to each of our parents, we can see the early seeds for what drives our unconscious choices that created our current life. For example, we may have felt abandoned by our mother, so we tend to recreate, unconsciously, situations in which we do not feel supported or nurtured. Maybe we felt aggressed by our father, so we tend to attract work or society situations that are dissonant with who we are or even abusive. Or maybe we just feel unwelcome in our work environment and become an overachiever or workaholic. Every person again will be entirely unique.
Don’t leave the tap running while you brush your teeth, shave or wash your hands. This can waste up to six litres of water per minute.
It was a beautiful walk – once I got up the first steep hill, I hit a large stairway bordered by a garden full of roses and blossoming trees. I could have just kept walking straight ahead, enjoying the flowers and never thinking to look behind me. But this is San Francisco, and you must always remember to look in every direction.
The Controller convincingly argues that the Indian patents act endorses a "local" working provision and that such a provision is compatible with TRIPS and the Paris Convention.
What game?
Sever LE. Ethics, Society and Occupational Reproductive Hazards: Fetal Consequences? Women and Health 2000; ….
Except that the local Post Offices don't make a penny from this, and, boy oh boy, don't they let you know! If you take it to the main Hebden Bridge Post Office they will complain every time.
With a student budget, I don’t have the luxury of spending a whole lot of money at Sephora or other department stores. But I do once a year (or so) I do splurge a bit there. So I thought that it would be different for this blog to show you all what my Sephora wish list is and maybe (if I can) you will see these items in a haul in the future.
Thanks to my friends on Twitter and Facebook for getting this document out. Without you my voice would be silent.
Shrimp, White fish, Calamari and mussels are fried and tangy onion and tomato salsa is on top. Normally, it is not easy to eat lots of fried food but with this tangy salsa, you can not stop eating it.
Nigeria was the most awarded country on the night, receiving 12 awards, followed closely by South Africa with 10.
A sumo wrestler’s chest.
What I do know is this...
#01-58
Not from each other. But from their Pack. Just for a night.
— Relevant magazine
Alli Blum: 215-642-0694
The peace plan agreed at the Arab summit in Baghdad (above) calls for the withdrawal of heavy weapons and troops from population centres, humanitarian assistance, the release of prisoners and free movement and access for journalists
So two new recipe successes in one week. Pretty pleased with myself. My family's palate is pretty pleased, too.
There are real standards of right and wrong that exist beyond the parameters of conditioning or social consensus. Am I talking about "religious stuff" now? I don't know, to me, God isn't "religious stuff."
Colleen Dietrich said... I really need to get me some SRM goodness! I've never used a sticker on a card, but am in love with what Jing-Jing did on all her creations! April 20, 2012 1:08 PM
Charger
Portraits
I'm laying in the sunshine on my deck typing this...oh how I desperately love the sunshine! I am not one of those Washingtonians who loves rain, unfortunately. I am laying here wearing pants that are a size smaller and underwear that is too big! I'm also finding that there is less padding and this deck is not as comfy to lay on as it has been in the past! All good things.
I would buy a huge sprawling Victorian with stairways that ran nowhere, rooms hidden behind bookshelves, secret passages and an attic full of ephemera (think Winchester Mystery House). I prefer it to be bit decrepit to add history, drama and intrigue. I would also travel, my big orange backpack atop my small frame, to destinations exotic and locales of ancient lore. Oh, and I would buy tons of clothes. Beautiful couture fashions from decades past. And shoes, lots of shoes.
All you have to do to enter is post a comment on this blog post telling me what kinds of things you'd like to see on this blog. Is there something that you'd like me to do an instructional step-by-step thing for? A cookbook you've been wanting to try, but are curious how the recipes turn out? Is there some vegetable or fruit that you're not sure what to do with and you need ideas? Do you wish I posted more soup recipes? Let me know and you're automatically entered to win the book.
The morning after I snuck away and napped on the beach, listening to the crash of the waves and watching a couple brave souls surf the contaminated beaches along the boardwalk, my little safe space in the decay. To my left was some bizarre Coney Island style carnival, and on my right was an empty billboard covered, I imagined in my stupor, by giant black flesh eating birds of prey. An intense heartless claustrophobia.
Quick to figure out that Indians love spicy, oily preparations (it’s not my fault that I love fried food- its in my genes for centuries!), the Chinese masala-fied and greased their cuisine and as a result came up with a mouthwatering combination.
A submarine. I’d like to think I’d be pretty safe from the brain-munching buggers. (Unless your fellow sailors are infected, Steve! Bwahahahaha!)
April 27, 2012: Malaysia has ordered 90 AA-12 radar guided missiles from Russia, for use on Malaysian MiG-29s and Su-30s. The AA-12 (or RVV-AE, or R-77) is the Russian counterpart to the American AMRAAM. The AA-12 is similar in size and weight, weighing 175 kg (385 pounds) versus 152.2 kg (335 pounds) for AMRAAM. AA-12 is 3.8 meters (11.9 feet) long compared to 3.6 meters (11.2 feet), and 200mm in diameter versus 178mm. The AA-12 has a max range of 90 kilometers (compared to 70 for AMRAAM).
Nobody knows more about this area than Eric Ferrara, a local boy who went on to start the Lower East Side History Project, and whose earlier book is A Guide to Gangsters, Murderers and Weirdoes. Like that earlier effort, his new book The Bowery: A History of Grit, Graft and Grandeur is an uneasy cross between a guide book and a history. It’s laid out and organized by address, taking you South to North, telling the interesting stories of each piece of real estate along the way. One might be tempted to tote the book around and take a self-guided walking tour, only there’s too much reading to do. By the same token, one would like to lie in bed and read the book, only then one would be frustrated by not being on site. The book will therefore work best for people who already intimately know the strip, and can picture the addresses as they sit and read. Or –and this is what I’ll probably end up doing — make a couple of trips to the Bowery, and reread the book a few times until both experiences are thoroughly blended in the Cuisinart of your mind.
Thread: DMC, Crescent Colours, GA Sampler & WDW cotton floss
UPDATE: THESE ARE PICTURES OF THE FULL SETS!
Human Events' Star Parker: "Republicans Can Win Back The Hearts And Minds Of Americans. But They Have To Get Real And Get Honest. Unlike The Former Governor Of Massachusetts." (Human Events, 12/21/07)
Dried Fruit (without added sugar or sulfites)
The Urban Park Rangers' Family Camping program is "one of the better-kept secrets of the city," according to the NY Times, and throughout the summer, New Yorkers can apply to win a camping spot in the Rangers' lottery system. Some of the more popular campouts include nights in Central Park, Prospect Park and Fort Greene Park. However, the program also offers camping opportunities in many lesser-known parks in the five boroughs that make far superior campsites. Camping with the Urban Park Rangers is free, and includes a tent, food and campfire. All that is needed is a sleeping bag.
Some of you might know that I also love creating things on the computer, such as invitations, candy bar wrappers, water bottle wrappers, etc. It's too much fun! So, today, I thought I'd share with you the most recent Bridal Shower Invitations I created. They are for one that I'm hosting and I think they are so adorable! We've decided to go with a zebra print theme and everything is just falling into place for this shower. I'm so excited and can't wait to get the banner made this week-end! Oh, sometimes in the photograph, the words get a bit blurry. Not sure why, but when we print them, they are fine.
All-in-all, it was a great weekend, and I feel more ready than ever to tackle the trails in Lawrence…not a bad way to spend the weekend!
Shamen Move any mountain UK
“We also made mistakes in the group stages. It’s our own fault.”
There were 10 of us paying €,50/week, bringing in €226.
Hello, my name is Jill. You may remember me. I used to post here somewhat regularly.
Baby's now the size of an onion!
North of Italy. Tangeros don't go to the milonga just to spend their time or fight their fears and loneliness. They are there! You touch them and you feel the energy and their feelings. If they like dancing with you, you will experience it 100%, same as if they don't. And if you are not honest or you don't dance with your heart they will just turn their back like you don't exist. There is no space for well educated, fine behaviors and manners, it's what you have inside what matters and what you can only use. And just like they want their pizza, espresso and pasta to be perfect like it has been for decades, similarly they will not take your tango unless it tells them a story...
After our little séjour à Paris, we headed back to Bordeaux. I had lots of things planned to see and do, but we kind of took the relaxing route and just chilled at Erika's a lot of the time. That was fine by me! However, I did show my mom the must-sees of Bordeaux, like the fountain at Place de Quinconces, the St. André cathedral, and of course Rue St. Catherine. We even got a drink one night at Charles Dickens (and got harassed by drunk French mecs) ! All part of the experience though. Erika and her daughters left for the campagne for Christmas, so the Americans had the house to ourselves. It was really nice- my mom cooked a delicious dinner on Christmas Eve which we spent with my roommates Laura, Deyuanne and her sister and brother, and our friend Hannah.
The next legislative break on eminent domain came in 2004, during a legislative session when the Republicans were taking over the Georgia legislature (they took over the state Senate in 2003 and the House in 2005). One new Republican State Senator, an engineer, introduced a bill to promote development. It had a new and dangerous feature: it allowed developers to make deals in which local governments would be obligated to condemn the property of third parties on the developer’s behalf.
Sandy's stuff
Today I voted to tell Virg Bernero no, you can't have any more of my money. I need it more than you do. You have streets to resurface- I have a roof to resurface. You have Police to pay for - I have $4.29 gasoline to pay for. Somehow I have to find a way to pay for that on my current income - so do you. So cut the fat, put off purchases, sell off assets you don't need (like some of those school buildings you've closed), and all the other things that we poor peasants have to do when times are hard.
When: September 19, 2009
I suspect it will only happen once China’s economic boom crests. Only when prosperity stagnates will the Chinese people begin to look at what is wrong in their country. Only then will the Chinese Spring emerge. And it is inevitable. Simply a matter of time.
O God who avenges, shine forth.
My mother has recently brought up wanting to adopt my son. I told her that there was no way, it was not going to happen. She has convinced him that it needs to happen and that I am selfish for not just letting her do it. I told her that I don’t trust that I would still be able to see him if she did because she has lied to me and used him against me when she did not agree with me in the past. To this I was told, “It always has to be about you doesn’t it?” This was from my mother. What I want to know, as MY mother, when is she ever going to make it about me, HER child. I know that my wants and needs are nothing when it comes to what my child needs and what is best for him. I wish to the Gods that someone would teach that woman the same lesson. I am tired of being hurt by her.
She looked about, and then at the place where her young grandson had been just moments ago. She looked up to the heavens. "Why, Lord? Why? Why did you take away my beautiful grandson, who had his whole life before him, and yet left me, a pitiful old woman at the end of her life? Oh Lord, I would rather that You take me instead of him!"
Now don't you feel better already just reading this? I know I do. Treat yourself, your significant other and even your children to this soothing treatment. At these prices you can have a facial monthly!
Some are contemplating the unthinkable: leaving the ANC.
Where have I been?
May 7 Kent, Ohio - Europe Gyro
In April 1988, two neighboring landowners, Donald H. Forsythe and Frederick S. Wilder, found oil on their property believed to have been left by a former Chevron gas station and an auto parts store on the site. Mr. Forsythe and Mr. Wilder were business partners dealing in real estate and insurance.
4 Samba fúnebre
A: Aus-tri-a is that quaint little country bordering Ger-man-y, which is
2 c. unbleached all-purpose flour
The India Cements Limited has informed the Exchange regarding the consolidated Results for the year ended on 31-MAR-2012 as follows: Net Sales of Rs. 463086 lacs for year ending on 31-MAR-2012 against Rs. 362236 lacs for the year ending on 31-MAR-2011. Net Profit / (Loss) of Rs. 27146 lacs for the year ending on 31-MAR-2012 against Rs. 6530 lacs for the year ending on 31-MAR-2011.
I do however profess to be a whiz at CrockPot meat and potatoes. Here you go! It's in my crock right now.
So what was lacking? Not much. Some sunshine, some warmer temperatures, I guess—I was expecting air temps to match the water temps (upper 70s) as they normally do in mid-September. (The water was great; the air, not so.) And there's the problem word: expecting. I was anticipating a certain type of visit, and we didn't have it. So now I feel disenchanted, disappointed, cheated of what should have been a warm, balmy weekend. But why? We're all humans living on this changeable orb. We know, by now, that weather is not a sure thing in any direction. We know that it isn't always sunny at the beach. Yet still, there's this pervasive feeling of discontentment in my gut.
Bless her heart, it made her butt look about forty inches long. That woman needed help.
Pendragon: Rise, gentlemen. Why have you summoned me?
Vanessa Van Petten is one of the nation's youngest experts, or 'youthologists' on parenting and adolescents. She now runs her popular parenting website, RadicalParenting.com, which she writes with 120 other teenage writers to answer questions from parents and adults. Her approach has been featured by CNN, Fox News, and Wall Street Journal. She was also on the Real Housewives of Orange County helping the housewives with troubled teens. Her next book, "Do I Get My Allowance Before or After I'm Grounded?" is being released in September 2011 with Plume Books of Penguin USA.
I think it's common as parents to second guess your choices or think that you may have made a mistake in parenting. I try to think that every time I have one of these aha! moments with E, even if it's just after reading a poster I came across on Facebook, that not only am I only human, I am becoming a stronger parent and person every day. And that's what life is all about.
» communicates with stand-alone-applications and hardware
Which LBD are you going to wear this year?
THE CABAL INTENDED TO SACRIFICE THE ISRAELI PEOPLE
Undeserving.
Anyway, big thanks to Hailey for bringing light to one of the Holocaust’s unsung (and frankly, kind of hated) flawed heroes. Oskar Schindler is a name known round the world for both his flaws and his successes. Kasztner is someone who I had never heard of before that day in Starbucks, which I think is unfortunate. Deal with the Eichmann or no, at the end of the day, he still saved the lives of 1670 people – and that is what he should be remembered for.
It spoke to me…
Of course, the process of a psychological child attempting to become a psychological adult is always painful for everyone involved. It rarely happens without tears. It is through practice of disobedience that a consequence receiver becomes a choice maker. The choice maker begins to feel that he is losing the hold he always had on the consequence receiver. If you succeed in becoming a choice maker, he cries; if you fail in your attempt, then you cry. Either way, the birth of a psychological adult or the failure to become one always brings with it tears. But those are life`s ways of evolving a new you. Either tearfully become a history maker or tearfully remain a history reader. The world that cries when you begin, will stop crying once you start producing results.
Every time I have to fold a pair of my underwear I get more sad.
The Gourds
The road to Emmaus was almost seven miles long. Why do you think his disciples did not recognize him?
Smellies (we always got bubble bath, i'm sure santa thinks i stink!)
“The Silent Treatment is a passive aggressive form of emotional abuse in which displeasure, disapproval and contempt is exhibited through nonverbal gestures while maintaining verbal silence.
In order to change the cycle of three defeats, one already in the bag, the Scottish National Party has to radically change.
1 c sugar
The drawing of the building was done one morning while I waited for the clinic to open. I usually get there 15 minutes before they open and I sit and have a coffee and get caught up on my internet reading (using instapaper on my ipod). This day I happened to have my Sketchbook Project 2012 sketchbook with me and decided to do a quick drawing while I waited. This was done in about 15 minutes, while sitting in my car, parked across from the door.
Lysius, the Roman chief captain, feared, for he knew well the forms of punishment that befell enemies of the state. No doubt, he had witnessed many of them. There were the various forms of secular entertainment that occurred in the arena, such as the gladiators, the stake, the lions and dogs. Then, there were various forms of torture, something akin to what he was about to do with the apostle Paul. This sort of prospect sent waves of fear through him. Our verse says, “The chief captain also was afraid.”
Venue: The ceremony will be in our church, but I'm working on the reception site. I'll probably cave in and have it at the same place. In fact, our sanctuary is huge (it's like twice the size of a gym and has a totally changeable setup), so Matt's mom has actually done weddings there where the ceremony and reception were both in the same ROOM. So I'm looking into that.
Our neighbours had rented a bouncy castle (a huge bonus with the kids) and hired a clown. Oh, the clowns! Never had them when I was growing up, so it took me completely by surprise when a flurry of bright orange, green and yellow stormed into the party room and started running around and shouting in his best Spanish. The kids, of course, were excited and even more so when the clown picked them to perform with him. Running, laughing and generally exalted mood ensued.
--Amex/Heart of Brooklyn
BLAMMO! JUDGE DISMISSES RAMBUS SUIT AGAINST INFINEON: In a case that was closely watched on this blog, Judge Robert Payne of the U.S. District Court in Richmond, Va., dismissed all of Rambus's remaining patent claims in the case, after it was found that Rambus' "misconduct" in handling documents and presenting evidence. The ruling came just before the claims were to be heard at trial.
He was less than thrilled to reenter our cozy home, but I am looking forward to our next adventure. :)
We all created a new project for today's announcement. I used my leftovers from the Saturday's collection. Well, I did get a couple of more sheets of paper because I had used it all already. How could I not?! It is so awesome!
Paul Dano ("There Will Be Blood") is the star in "Gigantic," filming on Cadman Plaza West in Brooklyn Heights today. McBrooklyn got a photo as crews were setting up this morning. (That's the Park Plaza diner on the left in the photo.) We'll try to update as filming gets started.
Spring is the time to get out into the garden and tidy up from the winter and start to sow seeds for the forthcoming summer, so I'm linking this for the following spring challenges:
REALLY? Yes…
10.Mile High Club feat. A Little Rooster
Alison's Pantry just started carrying some freeze-dried fruits and vegetables, Jeremiah and I downed the Pineapple! It was so delicious and a healthy snack! I was so excited because fruit is hard to feed a 1 year old, but these are just perfect! They are located on the bottom of page 27 in the #8 flyer!
An elderly Frenchman asks Leslie Howard's Percy Blakeney if the woman he's in love with is another man's wife. Smiling with great charm, Percy replies, "No, it's my own!" The Scarlet Pimpernel
I'll never stop being amazed by how beautiful Indian girls are.
Friendless as a child and now as an adult, The Mill often retreats to a canorous world of make-believe. Here, The Mill is smart enough to understand why many believe that M-theory unites all five string theories and perhaps supplants them; Carinthian Blondvieh cows give lectures on the significance of repetition in Eugène Ionesco’s classic piece of absurdist theatre, La Cantatrice Chauve; and Steven Gerrard plays tiki-taka. As regular readers who “enjoy” this column will have surmised long ago, this experience in the spurious is indeed the main reason The Mill is here early in the morning tapping out all the latest goings-on in the world of football transfers and with that, we are off to Manchester.
32 Ilous & Decuyper - Vous Mourrez Demain
Oh dear God. Jesus Christ on a fucking bike. Where to begin?
The term “imagination” in what I take to be its truest sense refers to a mental faculty that some people have used and thought about with the utmost seriousness. The sense of the verb “to imagine” contains the full richness of the verb “to see.” To imagine is to see most clearly, familiarly, and understandingly with the eyes, but also to see inwardly, with “the mind’s eye.” It is to see, not passively, but with a force of vision and even with visionary force. To take it seriously we must give up at once any notion that imagination is disconnected from reality or truth or knowledge. It has nothing to do either with clever imitation of appearances or with “dreaming up.” It does not depend upon one’s attitude or point of view, but grasps securely the qualities of things seen or envisioned.
Attention all girls interested in trying out for the VHS Majorette Squad for next year – There will be practice today at the Sailorway gym from 6:15pm – 7:30pm.
Last week’s post on the collapse of American education strayed a certain distance from the core theme of the present series of posts, the reinvention of a “green wizardry” based on methods and technologies tried and proven during the energy crises of the Seventies. There’s a purpose to the divagation, since what’s being discussed here is an educational project in the broad sense of the term, and one that has no real chance of being embraced by the established educational institutions of American society.
so to this weekend in its blaze of spring sunshine, glory and the lad's new streamlined look. we were entered for the ldwa spring into old hutton, near kendal, but were equally tempted to go off and do our own thing over higher fells. we went for the former and had a mixed experience i guess. the effort etc jim the organiser and his helpers put into putting an event like this on cant be faulted and again we're really appreciative of it all. like the 3 shires the food was excellent!
Don Draper in Mad Men is a womanizer and a liar.
I have searched the calendar three or four times,
Why did Bobby drop out of high school? Did he foresee that he wasn't going to pass? Did he fear being embarrassed before his peers, parents, and more successful siblings? Perhaps he was on a frantic, hormone-driven quest for independence and freedom. Maybe he was looking for a circle of companions where he could fit in under his own terms. There are many possible reasons why Bobby's life ran off the track. None of them are his parents' fault.
And so it was when I listened to Hite’s interview on The Game’s the Thing. The episode was mostly about Night’s Black Agents — itself a game I thought I wouldn’t want, but have since reversed position — but host Ron Blessing brought up Adventures in Darkness, a super hero universe created in an alternate history where Lovecraft survived his cancer and developed a writing studio to populate the pages of a comic book line.
and I am sweating a lot by now and thinking of
20 Mar 2012: A fire in the basement of a bank branch in Nouakchott caused by electrical wiring problems burned for three hours before fire-fighters arrived. They then punched two holes in the wall to gain access and control the blaze.
I think of that smile and know that the story has been completed.
24. Kai has an Airedale Terrier dog (male), its name is MeongGu.
Other blog stuff: A happy 69th birthday to "Shaft" singer Isaac Hayes. Shut your mouth.
Another factor, about which I wrote a few weeks ago, is the risk of people squandering the Labour vote either by not bothering to vote, or by voting for the minor parties, or for idiots like George Galloway, in protest at Labour’s perceived shortcomings. Or simply because, like me, they think Miliband is a useless bugger. It won’t take many results like Bradford to ensure Cameron is the come-back kid in 2015.
I can hardly wait until I roll that first loop and coax a brookie to take.
Oh, did I forget to tell you that I had 2 starports on each base? I began to mass carriers. Oh, this is getting good. I moved all my carriers to a remote corner of the map (Around 20 of them, fully upgraded with level 3 Armor and weapons and quick interceptors.
She cried constantly, ate like a fiend and when the day's food was gone, she would frequently CLIMB ON THE COUNTERS and eat whatever she could find. A loaf of whole wheat bread? Raisin bran? She was not selective about the ways she made me mad enough to black out.
The class impact of these facts is both apparent and ideologically inconvenient in the “politically conservative” discourse that exalts “the sanctity of private property rights” alongside the “invisible hand” of the mythopoeic “free market” in its pantheon. The fact that those who possess more economic power than others are able to use their political power to diminish the property rights of those less powerful is a fact that increasingly needs to be concealed. The drawback of Kelo came from its wearing away at that façade.
Read. Enjoy. Learn. Live.
4. Reelin' in the Years
shutting out and shutting in, separating inside
I’ve got it! I’ll call myself a “senses worker” and quiz the folks on my block with unconventional questions. Most of them aren’t good at spelling anyway, if the person who recently held a “garaje sale” is any indication.
Michelle de la Uz of the Fifth Avenue Committee, a nonprofit developer, told me, "The fact that we're faced with limited volume cap means we're going have to reevaluate how existing and additional volume cap is used. It's seems to me that we've finally woken up that, whatever the volume cap, we have to ensure that it's used for the maximum public utility."
Me: PUTANGINA, 2 HOURS NIYO AKONG PAHIHINTAYIN TAPOS HUHUTHUTAN NIYO AKO NG APAT NA DAAN?! WAG NA! HINTAYIN NIYO NA LANG NA MAGSARA NEGOSYO NIYO MGA BUSET!
With great pride, I announced, "That's my nephew."
Then they headed home for Oregon. They hit a snow storm and couldn't find their way, so they went down below 1,000 feet and followed the railroad tracks. His partner sat in the nose section and would yell, "TUNNEL" when he saw one and Lacey would climb over the mountain. They flew low enough to use street signs to guide them to Oregon.
I hesitated on how to handle the potty talk. And what we've decided on is that we won't ban the words from the family lingo. Instead, we set limits on where we can use those words.
“The idea came to me last summer — when thinking of things that USU offers in the summer — that a walking tour which highlights sculptures would be fun and interesting,” Stocker said in an interview. “I wanted to do it in a different way, utilizing web, and working on reaching a greater audience.”
She's right for someone but this one isn't right for me.
dried flower sprig
OK. Let’s test that hypothesis.
Not equal, as their sex not equal seemed;
1/3 cup semi-sweet chocolate chips,melted/microwaved on high for 30 secs.
You don't let 'em spoil your fun
The eagle-eyed amongst you will notice one or two changes twixt script and screen. There are no socks or launderettes in the film: I decided to keep the locations simple and socks really aren’t all that interesting to look at. I think the glove makes a decent stand-in though. Handbags, as a rule, tend to get nicked rather than lost, and so featuring an abandoned one would probably change the meaning of the film. Also skulking around the bushes in Victoria Park with two bags full of toys, a camera and a tripod and a handbag might well have raised the wrong kind of eyebrows and/or worried phone calls to the local constabulary. I think it was a sensible decision to leave it out.
Shockingly, this pair of unprudists have a curtain. What they don't have, is a fucking clue how to use it. It's strategically placed 1/2-way folded down. It's Pubes-R-Us over there.
Then the drivers "beat the side of his head with a shotgun." Said Marvin H. Flemming's statement: "I could hear some licks like they were pounding on him with the butt end of a gun. I heard the Negro say, 'Lord, you done killed me.' " Finally, said Charlie Covington, he heard Roosevelt Carlos Hurd Sr., a Blue Bird cab driver, cry out: "Give me the gun and let's get this over with." Just then, "a tall, slender boy with bushy hair hit the Negro in the mouth and knocked him down. The Negro started to get up when Mr. Hurd took the shotgun. He shot the Negro in the head. He unloaded the gun and called for more shells. . . . Mr. Hurd shot the Negro two more times." The tissue of Willie Earle's brain was left hanging on the bushes. The lynchers went back to Greenville and drank coffee.Of course, it was an all-white jury. Of course, they offered no defense at all. And of course, they were acquitted.
Preparing the Pierogies:
anyway,Adoption pics to follow soon :)
(iii) DPCM
Win a game session with 2 friends splitscreen.
After we got back we (as a family) went out for a nice, if not cramped, dinner. The place we went to is rather famed for its giant puddings and I decided I’d buy a slice of their newest cake which I can’t remember the name of! The nice thing is, if you buy a slice and can’t finish it they will put it in a take out box for you. They call it Cake-a-way.
Excitedly, I settled on a new eye-liner, REVLON Luxurious Color in Sueded Brown, and stocked up on my newest favorite mascara L’OREAL Voluminous Million Lashes. Seriously; if it’s good enough for Gwen Stefani…. Anyway, for me, I am always really confused about eye-shadow. That’s where Amanda came in. After perusing CVS’s enormous selection, we decided to try Milani’s RUNWAY Eyes in Fashionista Pinks. But Amanda always has this little bit of sparkle, so we also tossed Milani’s Peaches & Cream sparkly shadow into our cart as well.
“From what I understand, they were innocent men. But the Chinese may well have reacted in a peculiar way that would have seemed suspicious to the British, who were paranoid and ignorant of local ways. The British always had problems with the Chinese community.
They’re all the stuff of Trav S.D.’s Tent Show Tetrgrammaton. Three more chances to see it, including the perfect day of all days: April Fool’s Day.
Qualities looking for in Possible Husband: (mind you, don't need all. I'm stuck with who I'm given)
I'm getting much better cold wise...and business has been wonderful..which all
When I am drunk, sober, alone in my bedroom, with friends, or working out, the last thing on my mind is, damn, I wish I was jamming to some classic N*Sync right now.
Since Renwick’s preaching at Whinn Bog by Black Loch in New Monklands parish, Lanarkshire, was held in June 1684 and his preaching at Greenock in early August 1684, it is a reasonable assumption that the ‘Woolf’s-hole-craig’ preaching dates to around the same time frame, although technically it may date to any point between Renwick’s return to Scotland in late 1683 and early September 1684.
Turton warned in 2008 that this ‘overwhelming’ faecal pollution of the country’s preciously sparse fresh-water supplies – above and belowground, even in deep acquifers -- was mainly due to the near-total collapse of (at that point) 181 of the country's 232 municipal waste-water purification plants, all sited along the countrys network of rivers and dams.
preheat oven to 325 degrees. Butter 2 5x9 loaf pans.
*not that there are any
So, this Thanksgiving in our home, I'll be attempting the three P's that make it special for me & to me and hope that those who come to share this day of thanks with us feel loved and special the way I truly hope they will.
Teddy Long is backstage, looking for Aksana, he runs right into Titus O’ Neil and Darren Young, the newest members of Smackdown. John Laurinaitis signed them up, and Johnny tells Teddy that.
And I feel torn by guilt that I’m not doing anything to stop any of this. Even worse, I often deliberately ignore it because I find the anguish so draining that it debilitates me.
Lee Morgan, Virgil Jones, Victor Paz, Jon Faddis: trumpet, flugelhorn
I am entering this card in the following challenges:
If you engage in unprotected sex acts,
Nor was the ancient tradition of the saintliness of Laud and the orthodoxy of such High-Anglicanism as belonged to the Stuart period of the Church s history, ever quite effaced at Oxford. As on all else that was unworldly or savoured of high religious ideals, the influence of the eighteenth century rested as a blight on Oxford High-Church devotion. For more than fifty years the line of strict High-Anglican tradition had little more place than Methodism in the University. And yet there is reason to believe that it was still traceable here and there. It was, indeed, a purely English and Protestant influence. It had no sympathy with Rome, and was not ashamed of Protestantism. It was content to be no less avowedly Protestant in its antagonism of error than High-Church in its doctrinal teaching. But while it had no leaning towards Popery, the devout High-Churchmanship of Oxford a century ago construed the Prayer Book strictly, and believed in Lenten observance, in daily services, and in weekly communion.
Amato said that the permit will depend on a "biological judgment call" of whether land was an occupied habitat of a particular species. That area would have to fulfill an "essential behavior," including "breeding, hibernation, reproduction, feeding, sheltering, migration, movement and overwintering," according to the proposed rules.
Davis: That’s a very interesting question. Clearly, though, what’s happened with globalization has not been the transcendence of the nation-state by the corporation, or by new, higher-level entities. What we’ve seen is much more of a loss of sovereignty on some levels – and the reinforcement of sovereignty on others.
This guy is called Summertime Boy Soccer. I paired him up with some papers called Boarding Pass. The sentiment, the banner die cut and the soccer ball die cut are all from the All-Star stamp and die-namics set from My Favorite Things.
Anyway hope to chat to you soon since I got this damn thing working, and yes there was a time I would have blasted it with a bullet, as luck would have it I hadn’t got my gun with me. Ha! Anyway I’m way too old for shooting up things, Sorry to hear your in such bad health, I myself am going through the wars with health issues at the moment, I’m gonna be otta town for awhile so warning to you Eliza don’t be staying awake all night on the internet, get your self well. I will be in touch I promise.
Country music or Rock music
Now - I know what you're thinking. 140 calorie bratwurst. 100 calorie whole wheat hot dog bun. 0 calorie zucchini...that's not enough food to live on! And you would be right.
Beth: Miles 23-25.5, before the race even started I messed up my Runkeeper app by starting it early. So when I tried to start it again it counted 10 minutes of me standing waiting to start the race. Then somewhere along the lake the GPS decided I was further along than I really was. So this stretch I was missing mile marker signs, trying to decide where I might be in mileage based on my messed up app and losing my mind trying to do math. Ha There was one point I was like “surely I’m almost to mile 23″ and then I went “duh, you already passed that mile marker and SAW the mile marker!” Then in mile 25 I see Ted & Kimberly again! I half hear Ted giving me a motivating pep talk “…..Beth!! You finish this race you started….” Then I almost start hyperventilating because I was about to finish what I started!! I was so close! So I had to hold back my tears, but I loved that motivation at that point!
Where this unearthing exercise takes place depends on your culture. Among certain tribes of the western Pacific, there’s a whole ritual involved where the village elders gather around and chant celebratory songs as the booger is removed, then held high for all to see. In more civilized societies, the extraction is done in private.
Ground: Putty
He was found with a self-inflicted gunshot wound.
We didn’t use to keep chickens at all, I bartered raw milk for eggs, and let my neighbor have all the worries of chicken keeping, translocating my comfort level to her. So when we decided to start raising poultry to sell, we didn’t have to deal with “Grandpa’s chicken house” and all that entails. We could design our chicken business around what fit for us, and make the dwellings multi-purpose.
This went way too deep in the category of stupid me.
-- Boat Quest Part 1/Yaston Shard
UPDATE: 15th March, 2011. The CBI has responded to a request for further information on the baseline scenario and whether or not it is a forecast and has provided a 2-page briefing which includes “the Central Bank is applying a scenario that both commercial and residential property prices continue to decline in the base and the stress case. It is important to note, that these are not forecasts of outcomes but represent two possible paths from a large range of future outcomes regarding property prices. In this regard, there is a significant degree of uncertainty surrounding the range of possible future outcomes for the domestic property market. These are related to borrower and bank behaviour, measurement problems determining the of extent of property price declines due to the lack of a significant amount of transactions, and the continued unavailability of national residential and commercial property price indices, and future demand for residential and commercial property.” I must say that I find this unconvincing because of my understanding that the adverse scenario is supposed to be the worst realistic outcome and the baseline the most likely outcome. The baseline and adverse scenarios are not some random scenarios chosen by rolling a dice, they are deliberately selected (and other scenarios are deliberately excluded) because of what they represent and if the baseline does not represent the CBI’s forecast of the most realistic outcome for the future, what does it represent and why is included in the stress tests. In an entry later today, the CBI’s approach will be contrasted with the UK Financial Services Authority approach to the stress testing of UK banks which was published yesterday.
I've got a copy of AMAZON to send your way, whether you have a reluctant reader or not. Just leave a comment, extra Brownie points for Tweeting.
SALT is one of those I'm-a-spy, I've-been-wronged, I-use-all-my-awesome-spy-skills-to-save-myself-and-the-world, kind of movies. Angelina Jolie plays CIA agent Evelyn Salt. One tough broad. One day, a former Soviet government bad guy walks into the Agency in an attempt to defect. In exchange for help, he offers the agency information about a double agent. He names Salt as the double agent, while she is the one interrogating him. He tells her that she will be the one to assassinate the Russian president at an upcoming event. All of a sudden Salt finds herself being ushered to a secure room, while the agency contemplates her fate. She manages to get away, so she can prove her innocence and find the people behind the assassination conspiracy. But her actions cast doubt about her motives, and we are left wondering: Who is Salt?
These 2 lads dropped in on Saturday to buy a bottle of Smirnoff and left with the intended purchase and a couple of bottles of the above. Job done!
On The Old Front Porch
You’d win every time
He said it's about governance.
***Not her real name, but I've referred to her in this manner before so I'm stayin' with it.
Rather than protest the extravagance, California Attorney General Kamala D. Harris instead has sued San Diego because she thinks transit was not favored enough in the plan and thereby violates the legislative planning requirements enacted in 2006 and 2008. Her predecessor (Jerry Brown, who is now the governor) similarly sued San Bernardino County in 2007.
I would have stopped to take a photograph, but I had a passenger beside me, and so the opportunity was mist.
And don’t kid yourselves, it’s not about BP, one single oil company, and it’s not about Obama or Cameron, about single politicians. With perhaps slight differences, Shell and Exxon perform within the same dismal agenda's BP does, and there's no politician left in our Western hemishpere who rises to true power and has not been pre-empted by the system he or she voluntarily chooses to function in, and who doesn't voluntarily participate in perpetuating the hologram their voters long for in order to continue their feeling of comfort, so they can sit in their oversized homes and watch pictures of dying birds on oversized plasma TV's.
Game 2, Friedland, saw me battering away at Herbert, quite a relaxed game. He wasn't coming forwards into my massed Russian gunline and I wasn't going to far forwards into the minefield defence he'd set up around a village. He had to wait until my flank was threatened and the position unhinged by (wait for it) copius quantities of Light btns romping through a wood on my right. Then I had to fall back slowly but he didn't have the strength to press his attack. The French weight was elsewhere on the other side of the river.
No refuge from the skirmishing fine rain
With so much metal music out there, it's near-certain that there is a band somewhere out there that has devised a permutation of the form that utilizes whatever stylistics one might consider awful in such a way that they're convincing and engaging, beautiful. The more you dig (especially in the underground) the more you find beautiful exceptions to any rule. Saying "I haven't heard a lot of Heavy Metal music in which keyboards played a significant role" is a much safer statement for example, but one that very rarely substitutes its more extreme variant. Why do people refuse to dig in a music they profess to love and why do they prefer this broad and useless pontification?
It's not just the sap oozing from the tree-stubs that reminds me it's spring, though. The windows can be open most of the day now, and there is actually sunshine outdoors. Plus, of course, last night was Walpurgisnacht, which then segues neatly into May Day rioting, that old Berliner tradition. The park near my house was, for some reason, closed off and police stationed to check people coming and going, and there were helicopters late into the night. Now, I know there was also a Howard Carpendale concert last night, but somehow I don't think the security was about him. Today, broken empty bottles of horrific sorts of alcohol I didn't even know existed are all over the street, and, for the first time since I've been in this neighborhood, there've been police sirens at regular intervals.
The big problem, as has been repeatedly demonstrated, is that – here in England, at least – we have a largely dumb and lazy electorate, whose votes can be bought for a tax break in 2015 (if they get off their arses to vote at all, that is, and the right has always been better at doing that than the left), even though, if they stop to think, they’d realise that 2p off income tax is not a valid reason for giving anyone power for another 5 years, but I’ve seen it happen repeatedly. The Tories are past-masters at it – screw the people for 5 years, give them a few coppers, get welcomed back (though, to be fair, Labour have used tax as a bribe too).
And if that grosses you out entirely, this piece from GOOD points to the likelihood that you won’t actually have to see all the little bitty legs and antennae at all—in the future, we’ll be eating bugs disguised in food as “animal-based proteins.”
04 Full of Regret
I was stuck between the names Morgan and Mollie. Mollie was a bit too mainstream for me and Tyler agreed that he liked Morgan better. A neat little connection with that: Most of you know that Tyler is a numismatist (coin collector). His collection is mostly domestic and one of the main coins he has collected over the years is the Morgan Dollar. I picked the middle name of Kaye, as I like the sound of it and had a dream before we even met that I would have a daughter with that middle name, spelled that way.
Ladies and gentlemen: Sloth poop.
SS: I notice you have a lot of setups and payoffs in your script. My guess is that this means you outline a lot. Do you think outlining is important and what’s your process?
Her greeting is very cheerful but…
*Fireworks were originally set off, so we are told, to frighten away evil, and to awaken the slumbering dragon, a beneficent god-like creature who brings the crops spring rain.
8. This week I relearned to stay very calm. I really was a good girl, I didn’t freak out, I didn’t give a spiced answer and I even forced a smile when the tw@t of a dermatologist laughed and said ‘Oh, is this your first child? He he he, that’s why. And eczema has nothing to do with calcium deficiency. No, he he. But here in the tropics a lot of children have skin problems. It may go away eventually. And your son is looking fiiiine.’ Sure, now that the eczema has gone – because of the calcium supplement and wet wraps – he’s fine. He wasn’t fine though when I scheduled the appointment a few months ago.
The end of the verse goes:
Johnson was hired as a Senior Obama Finance Advisor and was selected to run Obama's Vice Presidential Search Committee.
black brad, sheer ribbon.
Now I grew up hearing that if the Bible repeats itself on any particular point, you need to pay extra special attention, because if God says something twice, then He means it, and He wants to get His point across. If He says something three times, then He really means business. (Have you heard anything like that, Jake? Sort of like a Baptist thing, I think.)
Stir the egg, cream and vanilla extract together.
Cut off, weave and pull tight. Weave ends.
I’m on your back (x3)
Since this is your first time on this difficult yet rewarding diet, I’m assuming you cheated and have eaten whatever else that you have eaten, so today you’re not going to have much to eat. Also I will be explaining some of my beauty secrets for better skin (today) and hair (tomorrow). But for now lets talk about your diet.
My job with Heart to Heart is to run the logistics of our Ready Relief Box™ program. I order medicines, coordinate with partner organizations and oversee the packing and shipping of the boxes with our staff at our Global Distribution Center.
SAM HUNTINGTON: We ended last season and there were cliffhangers with all of us. Josh had scratched Nora. Sally missed her door, so there are the ramifications of that. Aidan had the possibility of being given Boston. At the same time, the last scene with all of us, in the house, was closure for the season. Obviously, we would have to rebuild the house, but everything could be okay, from that point. But, what we end up rebuilding, in the second season, is a house of horrors. It is a nightmarish scene.
I did my best to wipe it up with my non-absorbent napkin as all the servers about didn't seem to notice or care. I was done trying to have a nice lunch with a friend, so we gathered our things and I wrangled my kids and left. She departed to the mall to go dress shopping and I departed deflated to my messy house where I plopped myself down on my couch exhausted from my lunch experience. I sat and felt sorry for myself as I looked around at all the work that was mine and the little people I had to take care of. I thought of my friends care free life who has kids in school all day and spends her time getting her hair and nails done, and shopping.
I'm enjoying the near-perfect weather we've been enjoying lately in the Bay Area. I made the mistake the other day, though, of saying that all I wanted to do was spend the afternoon sitting in the sun. I was at the dermatologist's. Whoopsie. I wear sunscreen and a hat, but apparently that didn't matter to the ladies in there who looked at me like I'd announced my plan to shave my head or something equivalently unthinkable.
Sounds familiar? Did you REALLY give any though to it until now?
It seems Liebster is a German word meaning "dearest", and the award is given to up-and-coming bloggers with less than 200 followers (and Steel Thistles isn't there yet!). So many thanks to Katherine, whose own blog 'Reclusive Muse', besides being the only one on the internet run by a unicorn, is full of fascinating insights into fantasy fiction, e-publishing, and interviews with other writers - click on her 'Muse Mondays'.
Now, you may have heard that you don't make friends with salad, but I think that that is only because most people are doing it all wrong. There are so many vegetable possibilities out there - all you need is two or three of them, and you've got yourself a salad. Lettuce-free.
What being on the outside of the medical word made me realize is that I want to work on the INSIDE of the medical world.
Mark the transient butterfly,
Related tags:
Great minds discuss ideas,
As for Indian trained IT workers being better qualified than their UK counterparts is concerned, as anyone who has spent an hour on the phone to Bangalore attempting to solve a Broadband problem knows, that's a joke, they're just a lot cheaper.
Micah - We love each other
Hey mister don't look down on me
Before I end this entry, here are some lines from You Da One. Lovin’ this song. *smirks* Some hidden meaning right hereeee. Lalalalala *winks*
I added have parents in my Ondine novels. When the idea for the stories first popped into my head, Ondine was an orphan, for only for a few seconds. Then I thought about how much more fun it would be to have a bustling family that threatens to overwhelm her. And also, what better way to freak parents out than a 15-year-old wanting to do the same things her 21-year-old sister does!
Level: 2
Last few weeks ago, while my family and I having
And, as she molded together a very impressive and realistic looking platypus,
Curlygirl has GOT to go into labor sometime! Squeaker was due yesterday. They may decide to induce tomorrow. Guess what? I'm going to be there.
My parents are fighting again and I don't know how to stop it. Stop the yelling. Stop it! Only I don’t say anything. I'm listening to an old fight. It reminds me of that scene in Nine Months where the quirky character Gail (Joan Cusack) says to her husband, “I can’t believe you are fighting during my moment. My moment! My miracle! She screams at him while he is punching and wrestling with another father in the delivery room. The laughter lightens me enough to remember that Dad was absent during my birth. According to Mom, he went out and got drunk while she was having a baby. (Really she can't remember which child it was.) Apparently, he met one of my uncles and they took off to celebrate. Mom said she could have died while he was out getting tanked. I heard this fight many times over the years. I don’t know the true story but I do know that Mom couldn’t get over it. She needed recognition and support, he wasn’t there.
Some really shimmering sharps and flats.
It is called Vedauwoo. Pronounced Vee-da-voo, meaning “Earth Born”, it’s formations are composed of 1.4 billion year old Sherman Granite. We have volunteered to be campground hosts here for the summer. The gates are still locked for the winter season so we hopped over, had a quiet walk around and let all of the goodness soak in.
and then it happens that i happen upon this piece displayed below.
First: prepare our clay pot; 2) prepare the rice; 3) make prawn stock; 4) caramelise our red onions; 5) marinate then 6) sear the prawns; 7) make the biryani marinade(masala); 8) mix it together and bake in the oven. Whilst it’s baking away we get on with our accompaniments: 9) make our masala; 10) cook our pappadums (yes folks, these are bought!); 11) make our coconut chutney.Oh, and use the seafood garam masala (click garam masala blog for the seafood garam masala recipe).
For not noticing all these signs
Djokovic now moves on to the ATP Masters in Shanghai, where he will face either Ivan Ljubicic of Croatia or Chinese qualifier Zhang Ze on Wednesday.
all this from a little dot
The grandfather clock in the hall chimed six-fifteen. Emily looked at the kitchen clock in surprise. Eric had been in the house for over twenty minutes. “You’re going to be late.”
Press freedom watchdog Reporters Without Borders is also backing the request that Hernández should be transported to Costa Rica.
All books go through a stage of being a work-in-progress. It could be rightly argued that they remain works in progress until the final edited version rolls off the printer’s assembly line. In many cases, thousands of penned manuscripts every year never escape the perpetual status of a work-in-progress. You could apply the same analogy to the state of the publishing industry at the moment. Challenged by the developments in the digital print industry and growth of online retailers and social communities, the publishing landscape in the past ten years has changed in a way we could never have imagined. Likewise the business models employed for decades no longer provide publishers with the tools to navigate the unexplored landscape they find themselves in today, and this landscape is also a constantly changing one. The traditional beliefs of the publishing industry that the book is a sole and sacred paper product for mass readership can no longer be the bedrock of publishers.
I had no good fresh photo for Skywatch this morning. I was going to skip a week.
What would it feel like to kill?
Yep, I went shopping. Sometimes I just need an infusion of new clothes….makes me feel all warm and fuzzy. How about you? Do you like to get new clothes?
“This is your screen size and resolution,” Neil confirmed “this is what you’re going to be building for as a developer.”
Post 8th March 2008, he claims to have heard our “signal” and implores for the rest of UMNO to take note and act accordingly as well. Since the elections Pak Lah has also said he will hand the reins over to Najib in two years bringing him within the first definition of “lame duck”. But, as I will shortly explain, he continues to demonstrate that he is an ineffective leader.
never handle having a stroke. The things you think you can’t handle, I already know I can handle. I say I can’t handle a wheelchair until I can’t walk. I used to say I can’t handle assisted living, wearing bibs at the dining room table. I burst into tears when I visited those places when my mother needed care. I said I can’t handle this, and neither can
Now it is time for our latest challenge and today which is a Recipe Challenge. Your recipe is Dry embossing and bling!
I double-checked to see if I had the "authentic hologram":
You can double check the angle with a protractor if you are uncertain...
So, Hubs, hope you are reading. There's got to be a spoil-your-wife kind of day coming up soon... Plus pampering is important. Just ask some of my favorite girls:
By this point, there were only a few single open seats at the counter. I ended up getting to the restaurant just after 1PM, and the place was pretty full. Tables seemed to come and go while I was there, and at one point, there was even a wait. All the seats at the counter to my left were open, as were 2 seats to my right. Half way through my courses, these were all full. That being said, David Chang is still doing something right (not that I have ever doubted it), and word is still out there about this place.
I look forward to a long and happy friendship. Should you need any deals on anything, I’m your Crab.
One moderately encouraging aspect of the report is the fact that the credit expectations indexes held onto the previous month’s gains, according to Wrightson ICAP. “The indexes for current and expected credit conditions held steady at their December levels, which matched the best readings in those measures since the collapse of Lehman. Small business owners still view credit availability as somewhat restricted, but conditions have eased again since the summer,” said Wrightson ICAP.
What’s that? It’s “hard place”? Oh. Let me try again.
Past the bend,
But, here’s how the mind of a stress monger works. I have now fully convinced myself that this could be a huge issue and have worked myself up into a tizzy. What if Pru is deaf? In reality, what’s the big deal anyway? The percentages aren’t that bad really, but I never liked playing the odds and I ALWAYS assume the worst. Why am I even worried? She’s adorable and could be taught hand signals. Amos, our previous boxer, lost his hearing with old age and the hand signals were an awesome way to still communicate and connect with him. So, why am I worked up over this? It’s what I do and I’m damn good at it.
The colours I have used are 'Not Quite Navy' & 'Soft Suede'. Again I raided my little supply of vintage charms and found the boat charm, which suited very well. The seam binding is also available from Stampin' Up as are the stamp lettering. I distressed around the oval. Not my usual girlie page this time for my two brothers...lol!!!
It is no secret or news that many people like dog meat (tortoise/snake/porcupine…). My dog-eating-expert said some people enjoy eating the meat while drinking it’s sauce(however that is). Local dogs ‘ekuke’ was the most favoured…’even tastier than foreign breeds’.
- 1 Tbsp peanuts & 2 T bps dried cranberries: You can measure out a whole weeks worth of this snack by putting in plastic baggies. Great for kids too!
As always dear souls, we ask you to feel and radiate the Love around you for it is increasing in frequency, purity and potency each and every moment. Oh dear souls, if only you could continually and in every single moment re-attune yourselves to the continually pure frequencies of the energies coming to you; it is simply that doing so would take up so very much of your much needed energy. Worry not, for your higher selves are sending you this energy in measured ways that you can better attune to and handle such energies.
When men, who here refuse to pray,
telling me to push again
good as on my previous visit although I had the quandary of what to do with the individual peppercorns that were balanced on the stick of celery above the glass which I hadn’t seen before. Those of us that had Bloody Marys wondered what the etiquette was. We all decided to tip the peppercorns into our drink and hoped it wouldn’t affect the taste too much. This was a good idea until we reached the bottom of the glass and started sucking up whole peppercorns through the straw so there was then the dilemma of taking them individually out of our mouths! Thankfully we were sitting in the “naughty corner” (an area slightly offset from the bar decorated with some of Terence Donovan’s more risqué photos) so were slightly hidden from view.
He does have a look of Stan Boardman about him.
Automatic Mojo
I have so much to do this month, it is Certifiably Insane. This week, I have but a few moments of peace (including a haircut/color, Peach’s first guitar recital, and Olive’s teacher conference), because starting this Saturday, it’s all Nutcracker, all the time, for the next week, including FOUR performances, all of which I’m going to. If I make it through that week, I’ve got my annual ornament exchange that Sunday, then two parties at The Job and two school assemblies the next week. That weekend, we’re hosting T-Bone’s work party on Saturday and a neighborhood party on Sunday, then I’m surprising Peach and Olive with tickets to The Lion King on the 23rd. And then it’s all downhill from Christmas Eve, straight through to Peach’s 10th birthday on the 30th, and our anniversary on the 31st. Dang!
Why are environmental issues also class issues? The relationship of the working classes to the environmental means of production (and reproduction) is not casual, but metabolic; environmental impacts are widely distributed across the population. Each person’s access to a variety of natural resources for personal survival, to say nothing of their role in the support and enhancement of what we are now pleased to call “life–styles,” is essential to both reproduction of labor power, and to maintenance of the mass consumption of commodities on which current capitalism depends. Private ownership and/or control of natural resources through titles to property is widespread in the global economy.
I’m not quite ready to share my new dream, as that’s what it is at the moment, NEW. But definitely keep your eyes posted on my little blog, because I imagine this is where I’ll be sharing my adventure with you.
Bad tactics: Trying to ram anything, spinning around aimlessly, being inside one if its wings are gone and its spewing out plasma.
So Dear Readers - your reactions to both the charming cover art and the disturbing blurb would be a delight to read!
Of course, even though we knew our granite was protected, we couldn’t help but worry about spilling things on it. Who wants to wreck their brand new countertops?
And the plain's unending line,
Aecht Schlenkerla Rauchbier from Brauerei Heller Bamberg was the first Rauchbier I ever tried about four or five years ago, so I was keen to revisit it. Even taking a sniff of the bottle after opening it told me this was going to be a more smokey experience. Pouring a deep ruddy brown, like well polished mahogony, it even looks smokey. The power of suggestion! The aroma isn't really as in-your-face as I recalled, but there was no mistaking that smoked ham-like tone. And to me, that's exactly what this beer tastes like. There are toffee-like flavours lurking underneath it all, but that sweet smoke dominates. The whole thing is drier than the Special offering, and this makes it a cleaner beer and easier to drink for it. I had been worried I'd find the smoke overpowering, but my memories had clearly amplified it. As it was, I found the smoke sweet and very enjoyable.
In season one, Rex (Steven Culp) and Bree (Marcia Cross) are on the brink of divorce. Rex has recurring heart problems and his health steadily declines. Surgery is scheduled but Rex dies before surgery.
Help students who visit The Career Center achieve career success by providing one-to-one resume and cover letter advising, facilitating practice interviews, and answering questions about HuskyJobs. Increase the Center’s visibility and impact on campus by speaking to student groups, creating new presentations, and completing projects with Center staff members.
I have an office that has three walls of windows looking out into my yard – I love my office. I write in the day (I give major props to the nighttime writers out there. I don’t know how you do it.). When I start something it tends to fly out of my like wildfire so I typically don’t start books unless I have long chunks of free day time.
1. Who is your "what-if" person?
Cam-Man was a little nervous, but he held out his hand and the cow let us pet her, and her calf. We loaded up back into the Rav4, and Cam was enchanted. Now, when you ask him what sound a cow makes, he looks at you and giggles and then says “MOO“, he’s learned it firsthand. When we got close to the Farmer’s, I pointed out the horses in the pasture, right next to the Farmer’s house. (We’re going to stop there another day.)
Sean's birth story is far from ideal. There are many things I wish I could change. I wish I had known our insurance would pay for midwives. I wish I had gotten a doula. If you're pregnant, get a doula!!! When it came to his testicular torsion, I wish they hadn't made us make a choice in such a fragile state. I was not able to think clearly and it was not a life/death situation. After research I have come to the conclusion his surgery could have waited. The twisted sign was gone. There was no saving it. If the other had twisted, there would have been obvious signs and we would have 24 hours to get him into surgery. Taking him from me just hours after birth was not necessary. I don't think his surgery was not necessary but just it could have waited until we were released at least. Looking back on his birth is difficult at times. Just typing it all out brings tears to my eyes. But then I try to remind myself that it wasn't for nothing. I've learned a lot since then and have used that to make better choices for his sisters. If his birth had been even ok, I may not have sought out the midwifery center for Maddy and then eventually a homebirth for Emily. This is our story. It is what it is.
Their fan base spans the globe, and AZIATIX have heard so many stories from them, where a sense of confidence and well-being is vital. The trio hopes their music will inspire fans and comfort them, knowing that things will get better.
Where have all the flowers gone? - 5.8M
-Pour a good amount of red wine vinegar over the hot farro, probably 2 tsp-1 TB worth. Add 1 large green onion, minced and toss to coat everything in the vinegar.
Robyn's Fetish Digital Stamps And More
But every now and then my husband Andy and I actually finish something. We chronicle our starts and stops on my blog View Along the Way.
Of sombre wind-rent flakes, that gather grim
It's a very manageable hop with only 14 blogs total.
I'll be back soon.....
The idiocy and outright hubris of travelers confounds, amuses, and frightens me. Miguel Loco and I still have a hearty laugh over the Newfoundlander who was convinced he could climb one of the nearby fourteeners in shorts, a t-shirt, and sneakers. He planned to grab trees and use those on his ascent.
He hung his head, "It's just been so long that I've been using and I can barely remember any of my life."
You would think that question would garner a lot of hits. Oddly enough, it didn’t.
3. Onion, medium size, 1.
2 factoring
It almost reads like a backhanded argument for the $300 million in special subsidies that the state's 421-a reform would provide to FCR, though that issue is not mentioned and, given that this article was likely weeks in preparation, could not have been the trigger.
“This is not just about dishonoring the Koran, it is about disrespecting our dead and killing our children,” said Maruf Hotak, 60, a man who joined the crowd on the outskirts of Kabul, referring to an episode in Helmand Province when American Marines urinated on the dead bodies of men they described as insurgents and to a recent erroneous airstrike on civilians in Kapisa Province that killed eight young Afghans.
audience was seduced by pop hits like "The Man With The Child
I recently watched a French film called “400 Blows” that resonated in my mind because I was considered a runaway starting at about the age of thirteen. The movie is about a young man whose life is sabotaged by adults, so he ends up running away, then stealing, and then he is placed in a reform school. The boy is not a hardened criminal but is treated like one by everyone responsible for him, and his life becomes a tragic injustice.
Also Paul had a mission to perform. He had collected financial contributions from many Gentile churches for the poor saints of Jerusalem. In his letter to the Romans he made mention of this with some reservation. I read Romans 15:31.
On the nose it’s very fresh and sweet. with the freshness carrying on to the palate with light tones of pear creating a long finish.
in her husky morning after voice,
Spread the news too! Please invite your followers to join the fun at Guylou's Inimitability.
Turkish Situps
7. Flip over, so that the other side will get cooked as well.
